<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88907-0036 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-07-88.f2.A1035</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 173 / Wednesday, September 7,1988 / Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Federal Aviation Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">14 CFR Part 13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 25690; Amdt. No. 13-18] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Rules of Practice for FAA Civil Penalty Actions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule; request for comments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This final rule sets forth revised initiation proceduresand new rules of practice in FAA civil penalty actions. The rules are neededto provide detailed procedures for on-the-record hearings required in civilpenalty actions by legislation recently passed by Congress. The rules areintended to provide an appropriate level of procedural formality in civilpenalty proceedings, focus attention on the rights of individuals subjectto civil penalties, and ensure that due process is afforded those individualsduring the civil penalty enforcement process.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>The final rule is effective on September 7, 1988. Commentsmust be received on or before November 7, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Comments on this final rule may be delivered or mailed,in duplicate, to the Federal Aviation Administration, Office of the ChiefCounsel, Attn: Rules Docket (AGC-204), Docket No. 25690, 800 IndependenceAvenue SW., Room 9l5G, Washington, DC 20591. Comments submitted on thefinal rule must be marked: Docket No. 25690. Comments may be inspectedin Room 915G between 8:30 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on weekdays, except Federalholidays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Allan H. Horowitz, Manager, EnforcementPolicy Branch (AGC-260), Federal Aviation Administration, 800 IndependenceAvenue SW., Washington, DC 20591; telephone (202) 267-3137.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Comments Invited </ITAG>The new rules contained in this amendment are purely procedural rules togovern on-the-record hearings required by statute. The amendments to thecurrent regulations are required so that the regulations will conform toexisting and recently enacted statutory authority. Because both the proceduralrules and revised regulations are required to implement the recently enactedlegislative amendment to the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, they are beingadopted without notice and prior public comment. However, the RegulatoryPolicies and Procedures of the Department of Transportation (44 FR 11034;February 26, 1979) provide that, to the maximum extent possible, Departmentof Transportation (DOT) operating administrations should provide an opportunityfor public comment on regulations issued without prior notice. Accordingly, interested persons are invited to participate in the rulemakingby submitting written data, views, or arguments as they may desire. Commentsmust include the regulatory docket or amendment number identified in thisfinal rule and be submitted in duplicate to the address above. All commentsreceived will be available in the Rules Docket for examination by interestedpersons. These rules may be changed in light of the comments received onthis final rule. Commenters who want the FAA to acknowledge receipt of comments submittedon this final rule must submit a preaddressed, stamped postcard with thosecomments on which the following statement is made: ``Comments to DocketNo. 25690.'' The postcard will be date stamped by the FAA and returnedto the commenter. A report summarizing each substantive public contactwith FAA personnel concerned with this rulemaking will be filed in thedocket. <ITAG tagnum="84">Availability of Final Rule </ITAG>Any person may obtain a copy of this final rule by submitting a requestto the Federal Aviation Administration, Office of Public Affairs, Attn:Public Inquiry Center (APA-230), 800 Independence Avenue SW., Washington,DC 20591, or by calling (202) 267-3484. Requests must include the amendmentnumber identified in this final rule. Persons interested in being placedon a mailing list for future rulemaking actions should request a copy ofAdvisory Circular 11-2A, Notice of Proposed Rulemaking Distribution System,which describes the application procedure.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>These procedural rules were developed by the FAA to respond to an amendmentto the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, contained in Pub. L. 100-223, theAirport and Airway Safety and Capacity Expansion Act of 1987, enacted byCongress and signed by the President on December 30, 1987. During preliminarySenate discussions of the proposed civil penalty amendment, Congress notedthe FAA's lack of statutory authority to ``prosecute violators of [theFederal Aviation Regulations]'' without referring those actions to theUnited States Attorney for prosecution in a United States District Court.Congress observed that the inability or failure of the United States Attorneyto prosecute civil penalty actions resulted in an ineffective deterrentto individuals or entities who violate the Federal Aviation Regulations.Congress determined that ``there is clearly a need'' for administrativehearings, tried and heard by the FAA, to provide effective enforcementof the FAA's safety regulations. As ultimately enacted, the amendment tothe Federal Aviation Act gives the FAA the authority to  assess civil penaltiesfor violations arising under the Federal Aviation Act, or a rule, regulation,or order issued thereunder, after written notice and a finding of violationby the Administrator. The legislative amendments give the FAA the authorityto ``assess'' a civil penalty for a violation of the FAA's safety regulations.This specific authority enables the FAA to issue an order that informsan individual of the alleged violation and that triggers an opportunityfor a hearing on the merits of the allegations in the order. Prior to the 1987 amendment, the FAA could assess civil penalties and prosecutethe civil penalty actions only in cases involving a violation of the HazardousMaterials Transportation Act, or a rule, regulation, or order issued pursuantto that Act. The FAA could refer the case to a United States Attorney for<T3>in personam </T3>collection procedures in a United States DistrictCourt if an individual did not pay an assessed civil penalty. Under theFederal Aviation Act, the FAA could propose and compromise a civil penaltyagainst an individual for a violation of that Act, or a rule or a regulationissued pursuant to that Act, but could not prosecute those civil penaltyactions. If the proposed civil penalty could not be settled by agreementof the parties, the FAA was forced to refer that action to a United StatesAttorney for prosecution in a United States District Court. Prosecutionin the United States District Court could result in a judicial determinationof violation and liability for a civil penalty. If an individual did notpay a civil penalty determined by the United States District Court, theFAA could refer collection of the penalty to the United States Attorney.The recent amendment revised that practice for selected civil penalty actions.The amendment enables the FAA to circumvent the complex and lengthy processof referring these civil penalty cases to the United States Attorney and,therefore, to strengthen the FAA's enforcement process. Under the 1987amendment, the FAA may prosecute civil penalty actions without referringthe action to the United States Attorney for prosecution in a United StatesDistrict Court. An order assessing civil penalty issued by the FAA willresult in a finding of violation, just as prosecution of a civil penaltyaction in the District Court could result in a finding of violation andliability for a civil penalty. Any order assessing civil penalty issuedby the Administrator, including an order that accepts a reduced civil penaltyin settlement of the action, will contain a finding of violation. Notwithstanding the revised authority given to the FAA, Congress explicitlyreserved and retained exclusive jurisdiction in the United States DistrictCourts over any civil penalty action initiated by the Administrator thatinvolves a civil penalty of more than $50,000; a direct <T3>in rem </T3>action or an <T3>in rem </T3>action based on the violation alleged in the civil penaltyaction; a suit based on seizure of an aircraft that is subject to a lienfor payment of an assessed civil penalty; and a suit for injunctive reliefbased on the violation alleged in the civil penalty action. Therefore,these actions will be proposed and compromised by the FAA or prosecutedby the United States Attorney using the same process and procedures asthe FAA has used in the past. Since 1974, the FAA has had the authority to initiate and assess a civilpenalty for a violation of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act.Pursuant to the 1987 1egislation, the FAA may initiate and assess civilpenalties, not in excess of $50,000, for violations of the Federal AviationAct. The legislation requires that civil penalty actions brought underthis authority be assessed only after notice and an opportunity for a hearingon the record, in accordance with section 554 of the Administrative ProcedureAct. The authority granted to the FAA by the amended legislation is effectiveonly for a 2-year period beginning December 30, 1987 and ending December30, 1989. The amendments to the Federal Aviation Act require the Administrator toestablish a ``Civil Penalty Assessment Demonstration Program'' in accordancewith the legislation and to study the effectiveness of that program. Thelegislation also requires the FAA to report to Congress, no later thanJune 30, 1989, on the results of the study required by the legislation.The Administrator is required to report on the minimum levels of civilpenalties established in the Act and whether additional changes to thecivil penalty program are necessary to provide an adequate safety deterrent.The Administrator also is required to make recommendations regarding theeffectiveness and continuation of the Civil Penalty Demonstration Programauthorized under section 905 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958. In formulating the procedural rules for the Demonstration Program, theFAA reviewed the present regulations governing proposal and initiationof civil penalty actions and the present regulations governing hearingprocedures contained in Part 13 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. TheFAA also reviewed the procedural rules governing hearings conducted byother agencies with authority to prosecute actions and conduct administrativehearings. The FAA believes that the detailed procedural rules set forthin this final rule, and the revisions of the sections of Part 13 that describethe process of initiating and proceeding with a civil penalty action, protectthe due process rights of individuals subject to a civil penalty. <ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Legal Enforcement Proceedings </ITAG>Section 13.15 applied to all civil penalty actions proposed for a violationof the Federal Aviation Act of 1958. The FAA is amending andSection; 13.15of the Federal Aviation Regulations so that it no longer applies to thecivil penalty authority that was transferred to the FAA by the 1987 legislativeamendment. This section is now limited to civil penalty actions that arewithin the exclusive jurisdiction of the United States District Courtsand are not encompassed within the authority given to the FAA by Congressin the Civil Penalty Assessment Demonstration Program legislation.Section 13.15 now applies only to civil penalty actions that involve anamount in excess of $50,000. Section 13.15 sets forth the procedures usedby the agency to propose and compromise a civil penalty action. The amendmentof this section is not intended to alter the procedures that were usedin the past in all civil penalty actions brought for violations of theFederal Aviation Act. The amended section contains the maximum civil penaltythat the FAA may propose for each specific violation of the Federal AviationAct or the Federal Aviation Regulations, including the increased civilpenalty that the FAA may propose against an air carrier and a commercialoperator. The amended section now refers to the FAA's authority to takeenforcement action based on a violation of the prohibition in the FederalAviation Act and the regulations that deal with smoking on aircraft andtampering with smoke detectors on aircraft. The amended section also containsthe delegation of the Administrator's authority to propose and compromiseactions to specific individuals in the FAA, and the procedure by whichthe FAA may settle a civil penalty action. Section 13.16 applied only to civil penalty actions for violations of theHazardous Materials Transportation Act. The authority contained in the1987 amendment is similar to the authority granted to the agency in theHazardous Materials Transportation Act with one exception. The statutoryauthority to prosecute civil penalty actions brought under the FederalAviation Act is limited to civil penalties that do not exceed $50,000;the authority to bring civil penalty actions under the Hazardous MaterialsTransportation Act is not so limited. The FAA believes that one set of procedures, before and during the hearing,for hazardous materials cases and cases brought pursuant to the FederalAviation Act would eliminate confusion and duplication in civil penaltyproceedings. The FAA determined that it was more efficient to incorporatecivil penalty procedures under the Federal Aviation Act into an existingsystem rather than create an entirely new process of initiation and prosecutionof civil penalty actions. Thus, the FAA retained the basic organization and procedures containedin andSection; 13.16, which are familiar to the aviation industry in hazardousmaterials civil penalty actions, and amended that section to implementthe new statutory authority given to the FAA to prosecute a civil penaltyaction for a violation of the Federal Aviation Act. However, the procedureswere modified so that an individual may request a hearing on the meritsof an order of civil penalty instead of on the merits of a notice of proposedcivil penalty. This modification reflects the procedures used by the FAAand the aviation community in certificate actions before the National TransportationSafety Board (NTSB) and provides a familiar and similar procedural structurefor all regulatory enforcement actions taken by the FAA. A request forhearing under these procedural rules need not be a formal, technical document.The rule allows an individual to request a hearing by merely submittinga handwritten letter to the agency attorney. An individual requesting ahearing also has an opportunity to suggest a location for the hearing inthis document. Prior to the amendment of andSection; 13.16, an individual who had receiveda notice of proposed civil penalty for a violation of the Hazardous MaterialsTransportation Act could immediately request a hearing on the allegationscontained in that notice. An individual subject to a notice of proposedcivil penalty could only request a hearing before the Administrator issuedan order assessing a civil penalty. After the Administrator issued an order,the rule provided no further opportunity for a hearing on the merits ofthe notice. Based on the FAA's experience in certificate actions, the FAA believesthat a hearing on the allegations contained in a notice, which is merelya proposal, is premature. The notice is issued after the FAA has completedan investigation of the allegations. However, the individual may or maynot have taken part in the investigatory process. The FAA reviewed theexisting notice and prehearing procedures contained in andSection; 13.16and retained the informal proceedings that are available after a noticeof proposed civil penalty is issued. Therefore, the rule provides an opportunityfor informal proceedings in which an individual may submit informationor discuss the matter with an agency attorney. These informal proceedingsenable an individual to submit information including mitigating factorsor extenuating circumstances that may affect the FAA's decision to continueto prosecute a civil penalty action. The FAA views the informal proceedingsas an opportunity to narrow the differences between the parties with theintention of settling a civil penalty action. Even if the parties can notagree to settle the matter, the informal proceedings serve to focus anyremaining unresolved issues. Recognizing that some individuals may not take advantage of the opportunityto participate in informal proceedings provided in the rule, and to complywith the Congressional mandate to provide an opportunity for a hearing,the amended rules provide two opportunities for an individual to requesta hearing on alleged violations of the Federal Aviation Act or HazardousMaterials Transportation Act. First, an individual may forgo the informalproceedings provided in andSection; 13.16 by requesting a hearing after receiptof a notice of proposed civil penalty. The notice of proposed civil penaltywill be reviewed by the agency attorney, and in appropriate cases, an orderof civil penalty will be issued which will serve as the complaint in theproceedings. This review gives the FAA a final opportunity to determineif prosecution of the action is warranted. Second, an individual may requesta hearing after participating in any informal proceedings with an agencyattorney. Thus, the order of civil penalty issued after a request for ahearing in these cases enables the agency to tailor the order of civilpenalty to reflect any changes to the notice of proposed civil penaltybased on information submitted during the informal proceedings. The FAAbelieves that it is appropriate and logical to hold a hearing on the meritsof the order of civil penalty which contains the most concise statementof alleged facts and regulatory or statutory violations.The basic provisions of andSection; 13.16 regarding referral of an actionto the United States Attorney for collection of an assessed civil penaltyhave been retained. Therefore, the FAA need only refer civil penalty actionsunder andSection; 13.16 to the United States Attorney for collection of thepenalty if a person subject to an order assessing civil penalty does notpay the assessed civil penalty. In addition, the agency may use the proceduresestablished by the Department of Transportation to implement the Debt CollectionAct to collect any assessed civil penalty. Section 13.16 requires an individual to proceed through the entire administrativeprocess set forth in these rules before appealing any decision or orderto an appellate court. A party may appeal a final decision and order ofthe Administrator, issued after appeal of an administrative law judge'sinitial decision to the FAA decisionmaker, if the party complies with therequirements of section 1006 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended.A party may not appeal an initial decision of an administrative law judgedirectly to the courts of appeals of the United States or the United StatesCourt of Appeals for the District of Columbia. The requirement to exhaustadministrative remedies prior to appellate review by a court of appealsguarantees that the issues have been fully developed before the agencyand provides a complete administrative record for judicial review. Promulgation of these rules does not revoke, expressly or implicitly, SubpartD of Part 13. Although that subpart will not govern civil penalty actionsaddressed in this final rule, Subpart D will continue to govern hearingsrequested to review FAA orders charging a violation of Title V of the FederalAviation Act of 1958, as amended; orders of compliance, cease and desistorders, orders of denial, or orders of compliance under the Federal AviationAct of 1958, as amended; the Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970;and the Airport and Airways Improvement Act of 1982, as amended by theAirport and Airway Safety and Capacity Expansion Act of 1987; and ordersof immediate compliance under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Procedural Rules </ITAG>Section 13.201 repeats the provisions of the Federal Aviation Act and theHazardous Materials Transportation Act defining who is subject to a civilpenalty for specific violations and the maximum civil penalty that theAdministrator may assess for a violation. That section specifically statesthat the procedural rules contained in Subpart G do not apply to civilpenalty proceedings that were initiated before the effective date of theprocedural rules. Cases or hearings that were initiated prior to the issuanceof these rules are governed by the rules in effect at the time they wereinitiated. Section 13.202 includes definitions of words and phrases used repeatedlyin the procedural rules and definitions of concepts that may not be clearfrom the language of a particular rule. Definitions of ``mail'' and ``personaldelivery'' have been included to ensure that filing and service requirementsare consistent and to provide a variety of methods by which a person canfile and serve documents. For example, an overnight express courier statedin ``mail'' would include services that deliver packages the day afterthey are deposited with the courier, such as DHL, Federal Express, andthe U.S. Postal Service's ExpressMail. Services that deliver packages onthe same day they are presented to the messenger are encompassed withinthe definition of ``personal delivery.'' The terms ``contract or expressmessenger services,'' used in the definition of ``personal delivery,''include the use of bicycle or automobile messengers who deliver packageswithin a local, specified area and individuals employed by firms or businessesthat deliver documents or mail for that business. Section 13.203 describes the individuals within the FAA who will prosecutecivil penalty actions. Agency attorneys will represent the agency duringthe initiation of a civil penalty action, any settlement of a civil penaltyaction, any hearing requested under Subpart G of Part 13, and any appealof an initial decision issued after the hearing. The rule states that agencyattorneys involved in prosecution of a civil penalty will not, at any timeor in any manner, advise the FAA decisionmaker during the hearing or theappeal of a civil penalty action. An agency attorney who prosecutes a civilpenalty action on behalf of the agency is permitted by this section toconsult with, and advise, the FAA decisionmaker regarding the action untila notice of proposed civil penalty is issued by the Administrator. TheAdministrator is permitted to participate in the decision whether to issuea notice of proposed civil penalty in the first instance. Section 13.203also describes the individuals who will advise the FAA decisionmaker duringany appeal of a decision by an administrative law judge. These individualsare separated from the agency attorneys who prosecute civil penalty actions.This provision ensures that the FAA decisionmaker is insulated from anyperson who is involved in prosecution of a civil penalty action. Thus,the Administrator's duty to function as an independent decisionmaker inthe administrative process remains untainted by the collateral agency prosecutorialfunction.Section 13.204 states that persons charged with a violation may providetheir own representation during a hearing or an attorney may representthe person charged with a violation. The FAA does not keep a register ofattorneys who may participate in hearings under this subpart. No attorneyis required to submit an application to practice before the FAA in civilpenalty hearings. Like the procedural rules of practice of the NTSB inair safety proceedings, the FAA rule allows other individuals, who arenot licensed attorneys, to advise or represent a person charged with aviolation. Nothing in this section prohibits individuals from representingthemselves if they so desire. To that end, the rules were drafted so thatindividuals who represent themselves are not misled by overly-technicalprocedural requirements. Section 13.205 describes the authority, and limitations of that authority,of the administrative law judge in civil penalty proceedings. The powersof the administrative law judge are based on the powers outlined in theAdministrative Procedure Act. Section 13.205 includes a provision thatenables the administrative law judge to disqualify himself or herself fromthe proceedings. In addition, a party can request that an administrativelaw judge not participate in a particular proceeding if the party filesa motion for disqualification pursuant to andSection; 13.218. If the administrativelaw judge denies a party's motion for disqualification, the party may filean interlocutory appeal for cause pursuant to andSection; 13.219. Unlike its counterpart in Subpart D, andSection; 13.206 prohibits interventionby any person who does not have a statutory right to intervene. In theFAA's experience, intervention requests are infrequent in enforcement actions,and these requests generally are denied. The FAA believes that requeststo intervene would result in unnecessary delay and expense to the trueparties in the civil penalty proceedings. Section 13.207 is included in the procedural rules to ensure that a partydoes not submit documents that may require a response under the rules orthat may raise extraneous issues solely to harass another party or to increasethe time and expense of the proceedings. The FAA believes that this sectionwill help to protect the integrity of the proceedings. Sections 13.208 and 13.209 state the procedures and requirements for filinga complaint in the proceedings and for filing an answer to the allegationscontained in the complaint. After an individual has requested a hearing,the agency attorney will file an order of civil penalty, which serves asthe complaint in the proceedings, with the hearing docket clerk. The ruleallows an individual to submit the answer in the form of a letter and inlegible, handwritten form. This section is intended to provide great flexibilityand easy access in the hearing process so that an individual is not forcedto hire an attorney for the proceedings. An individual who requests a hearing is permitted to suggest a locationfor a hearing with his or her request pursuant to andSection; 13.16(i) ofSubpart C. If the agency attorney disagrees with the individual's suggestedlocation, andSection; 13.208 enables the agency attorney to suggest a differentlocation for the hearing. If the parties do not agree on the location forthe hearing, the hearing docket clerk will set the hearing for a locationnear the place where the incident occurred. The FAA believes that thislocation will be convenient because most of the witnesses and the relevantevidence will be available at that location. In addition, the administrativelaw judge has the authority to grant a party's motion to move the hearingto a location other than the location set by the hearing docket clerk.Pursuant to andSection; 13.221(c), either party can submit information tothe administrative law judge that supports a motion to move the hearingif that location later proves to be inconvenient or inaccessible. Pursuant to andSection; 13.209, an individual has 30 days from the time thatthe order of civil penalty was served to file an answer. If an individualfails to file any answer within the 30 days, without good cause for thefailure to file, the allegations in the order of civil penalty are consideredto be admitted and an order assessing civil penalty will be issued. TheFAA recognizes that this is a severe penalty for failure to file an answer.However, the FAA believes that this will discourage spurious or dilatoryrequests for a hearing. The FAA anticipates that this section will encouragea person who legitimately disputes the finding of violation contained inthe order to use the hearing process to resolve genuine issues of factand law. The rule requires that a person specifically address each allegation inthe order of civil penalty. This requirement eliminates the burden on theparties of submitting evidence and proving matters that are not truly indispute. The rules provide requirements for filing and service of documents submittedin civil penalty actions. Since certain consequences flow from the dateof filing or the date of service, andSection;andSection; 13.210 and 13.211specifically address the dates when documents are considered to have beenfiled or served during the proceedings. Under andSection; 13.211, a certificateof service is not required in these actions. The FAA believes that a requirementto attach a certificate of service to a document is overly-technical andcould prejudice an individual who is unfamiliar with procedural requirements.The FAA believes it is prudent to avoid the dismissal of an action basedsolely on a technical, procedural requirement. However, because certainbenefits attach to the use of a certificate of service, the rule allowsany party to attach a certificate of service to a document submitted forfiling.Section 13.211 includes an automatic 5-day extension of time to respondor act after a party has received a document that was served by mail. Therule provides a 5-day grace period so that a party will not be penalizedfor unanticipated or unexplained delays in the mail during that grace period.The FAA believes that the additional time period is sufficient and willeliminate disputes based on unavoidable delays not directly attributableto a party. The FAA has included many provisions in these rules that allow the partiesto determine schedules and procedures without requiring the administrativelaw judge to issue an order on each issue. The FAA believes that theseprovisions provide flexibility for the parties and the ability to accommodatereasonable requests, while preserving the due process rights of individualsand prosecutorial discretion of the agency. Many of these matters can beagreed upon between the parties without oversight by the administrativelaw judge until there is a dispute that the parties cannot resolve. Forexample, andSection; 13.213 allows each party to extend the time for filingany document once, without the consent of the administrative law judge,if they can agree to the extension. If the parties do not agree to an extension,the rule allows one party to submit a motion to the administrative lawjudge requesting an extension. Similarly, andSection; 13.217 allows the parties to control many of the prehearingand discovery aspects of a civil penalty action. In most of these situations,the parties are in the best position to schedule discovery matters anddetermine the course of prehearing proceedings. If the parties fail toagree on a joint procedural or discovery schedule, the FAA envisions thatthe parties will follow the rules addressing prehearing motions and therules governing discovery. This section does require that the parties submitall prehearing motions, responses to these motions, and agree to closediscovery not later than 15 days before the hearing. This requirement givesthe administrative law judge time to resolve all pending motions beforethe hearing and gives the parties time to prepare for the hearing. Section 13.218 sets forth general requirements for any motions submittedby the parties and also addresses the requirements for certain motionsthat are commonly submitted by either or both of the parties before andduring hearings. This section requires the administrative law judge torule on prehearing and discovery motions within a specific time beforethe hearing so that the factual and legal issues are sufficiently narrowedand the parties have adequate time to prepare for the hearing. Several of the specific motions addressed in the rule may be filed by aperson subject to an order of civil penalty instead of an answer. The motionsthat may be filed instead of an answer are a motion to dismiss the orderof civil penalty for insufficiency because the order fails to state a violation,a general motion to dismiss, and a motion for more definite statement ofthe allegations contained in the order of civil penalty. Under the rules,the action will not be dismissed for failure to file an answer if thesemotions are filed instead of the answer. The rules also describe the proceduresthat the parties must follow after the administrative law judge has ruledon one of these motions. Section 13.218 allows any party to submit a motion for decision that wouldterminate the proceedings at any time before the administrative law judgehas issued an initial decision. This motion is intended to provide a singlemechanism for early disposition of the case where the pleadings or evidence,or both, submitted by a party show that there is no factual dispute betweenthe parties and that the matter should be resolved by the administrativelaw judge. This single motion is intended to include different, but conceptuallysimilar, motions such as a motion for summary judgment and a motion forjudgment on the pleadings. Section 13.218 also addresses the proceduresthat a party must use in order to file a motion for disqualification ofan administrative law judge. Section 13.219 allows the parties to appeal certain decisions of the administrativelaw judge to the FAA decisionmaker during the course of the proceedingsinstead of waiting until the administrative law judge has issued an initialdecision. This section describes the interlocutory appeals permitted bythe rule. The rule provides an interlocutory appeal, with the consent ofthe administrative law judge, if a party demonstrates good cause for theappeal. The rule also allows appellate review by the FAA decisionmaker,without the consent of the administrative law judge, for decisions thatdeny a motion for disqualification, bar an attorney from the proceedings,fail to dismiss the proceedings after the parties have settled the action,exceed the limitations on the power of the administrative law judge containedin the rules, and dismiss part of the proceedings pursuant to a motionto dismiss. Although the rule provides an immediate interlocutory appealof right if an administrative law judge imposes any sanction not specifiedin the procedural rules, this section does not limit the FAA decisionmaker'sability to sustain the sanction. The FAA decisionmaker has broad authorityto review the circumstances that prompted the sanction and to determinewhether the sanction is appropriate in those circumstances. If a party notes or files an interlocutory appeal, the appeal suspendsthe proceedings until the stay dissolves or the FAA decisionmaker has resolvedthe issues raised in the interlocutory appeal. The rule provides acceleratedtime limits for filing a notice of interlocutory appeal and brief in supportof the interlocutory appeal. The FAA has included a specific provisionin the rule on interlocutory appeals that would provide sanctions againsta party who files unnecessary or dilatory interlocutory appeals. Further,documents filed in an interlocutory appeal must be signed by the party,by the attorney, or by the party's representative and, therefore, thatperson certifies that the document is submitted for a proper purpose. Aparty, an attorney, or a party's representative who files an interlocutoryappeal in violation of the certification rule is subject to the sanctionsspecified in that rule. Section 13.220 provides discovery rules that are similar to the discoverypermitted under the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure. However, the discoveryrules have been tailored to accommodate the less formal requirements ofadministrative practice. The discovery rules provide procedures to requestconfidential orders or protective orders that are intended to protect proprietarydata or information and sensitive material that has been requested by aparty.The discovery rules require a party to supplement or change a responseto a discovery request as soon as new information is received. This requirementrelieves the requesting party from the burden of submitting additionalrequests to update or correct prior responses. The duty to supplement oramend prior responses is based on, but is not broader than, the duty containedin the revised discovery rules of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.The rule permits a party to take depositions of any person. The persontaking the deposition is required to notify the person who will be deposed,the administrative law judge, the hearing docket clerk, and each party,at least 7 days before the date scheduled for the deposition. However,the administrative law judge may allow a party to take a deposition withless than 7 days notice. The person being deposed is required to sign thedeposition unless the parties waive that requirement. The rule limits theuse of the deposition by a party at the hearing only upon a showing ofgood cause by the party who wants to use the deposition.The rule states that a party cannot serve more than 30 interrogatoriesto any other party. Each subpart of a question is counted as a separatequestion. The rule limits the number of interrogatories to avoid repetitiveand burdensome requests. A party may receive permission from the administrativelaw judge to serve additional interrogatories in certain limited situations.Unlike the rule limiting the number of interrogatories, the FAA did notlimit the number of requests for admission that a party may serve on anotherparty. The rule specifies severe penalties for a party's failure to respondin some manner to a request for admission. Material that is admitted bya party can be used for all purposes in the hearing and any appeal. Inaddition, the FAA may use information that has been admitted by a partywhere it is relevant to future enforcement proceedings by the FAA. TheFAA's use of admitted information is necessary because the Hazardous MaterialsTransportation Act requires the Administrator to consider a person's historyof prior violations when determining the amount of civil penalty to beassessed in other unrelated civil penalty actions. Also, considerationof an individual's compliance disposition is necessary to determine anappropriate civil penalty that would deter violations of the FAA's safetyregulations. The FAA's experience in certificate actions before the NTSBsupports consideration of prior violations when determining an appropriatesanction.Section 13.220 provides a method to compel a party to comply with reasonablediscovery requests. The rule also provides a method to force a party tocomply with a discovery order or an order to compel issued by the administrativelaw judge. This section of the rule limits the sanctions that the administrativelaw judge can impose to the particular failure of the party. This willavoid complete dismissal of the case based solely on a failure to participatein discovery.Section 13.22l sets forth general rules for notice of the date, time, andlocation of the hearing. The administrative law judge is required to givethe parties 60 days notice of the date and time of the hearing. The FAAanticipates that the administrative law judge will allow ample, but notexcessive, opportunity for the parties to enter into a joint proceduralschedule or to conduct discovery without the aid of a joint schedule. Evenif the administrative law judge sets a hearing date as soon as the caseis assigned, the FAA believes that 60 days is sufficient time for the partiesto conduct discovery and file prehearing motions. The rule allows the partiesto agree that the hearing be held on an earlier date if the administrativelaw judge is available on the earlier date.During the 2-year civil penalty assessment demonstration program, the FAAhas elected to use administrative law judges employed by the Departmentof Transportation who will travel to the hearings. The FAA has attemptedto craft a rule that provides maximum flexibility to accommodate personsrequesting hearings under these rules and to accommodate the schedulesof the administrative law judges.Section 13.222 places very few restrictions on the type of evidence thata party may submit in support of the case or a defense. All evidence isadmissible in civil penalty assessment proceedings except evidence thatis not relevant or material to the action or that is repetitious of evidencealready submitted by a party. This section was intended to be as broadas, and consistent with, the Administrative Procedure Act so that the administrativelaw judge can consider all relevant and material evidence in the action.The FAA is aware that, in many cases, individuals subject to an order ofcivil penalty must rely on hearsay evidence in defense of their case. TheFAA believes that general admissibility of all evidence, including hearsay,is critical to ensure a full and complete record for decision. To ensurethat hearsay evidence is not excluded in civil penalty actions, the FAAhas inserted a specific provision stating that hearsay evidence is admissiblein civil penalty actions. The reliability and probative value of the hearsayevidence will be considered when deciding the weight to be accorded hearsayevidence.Section 13.226 allows the parties to request that portions of the recordbe sealed and prohibited from disclosure to the public. The administrativelaw judge may order information withheld from the public if revealing theinformation would be detrimental to aviation safety or would not be inthe public interest. The administrative law judge may prohibit disclosureof any information that is not required, by statute or regulation, to bedisclosed to the public.Section 13.228 provides that a party may obtain a subpoena, once it hasbeen signed by the docket clerk or the administrative law judge, from thehearing docket clerk. The party who obtains the subpoena is responsiblefor delivering the subpoena to the person whose attendance is requiredto testify or to produce documents. Under the rule, a party is entitledto seek judicial enforcement of a subpoena if the party shows that theperson subject to the subpoena has failed or refused to comply with theterms of the subpoena. The FAA believes that the burden of obtaining judicialenforcement of a subpoena properly lies with the party who seeks to compelattendance at a hearing or to compel production of documents in a proceeding.Any person who receives a subpoena may request that the administrativelaw judge nullify, or modify, the requirement to appear or the requirementto produce documents described in the subpoena. A motion to quash or modifya subpoena can be submitted to the administrative law judge any time beforethe time stated in the subpoena for testimony or production of documents.The requirement to appear or to produce documents is suspended from thetime the person files the motion with the administrative law judge untilthe administrative law judge rules on the motion. Section 13.230 describes the material that will constitute the record inthe proceedings. All testimony submitted by any party during the hearing,all exhibits received into evidence by the administrative law judge, anymotions submitted to the administrative law judge, and all rulings by theadministrative law judge or the FAA decisionmaker on interlocutory appealare included in the record. Any person may examine a copy of the recordat the hearing docket. In addition, any person may have a copy of thoseportions of the record, that are not sealed or subject to a confidentialorder, if they pay the costs of copying the record. Pursuant to andSection; l3.231, the FAA intends that, in the majority ofcases, oral arguments will be made by the parties during the hearing andat the close of the hearing. The FAA believes that oral argument is appropriatefor civil penalty actions, is more efficient, and is less burdensome onthe parties. At the same time, oral argument does not limit full presentationof the issues and complete development of the arguments that a party wishesto present to the administrative law judge for consideration. The FAA believesthat written argument, either during the hearing or at the close of thehearing, is necessary only in clearly complex or unusual cases. For example,cases involving highly technical equipment or maintenance violations, orcases requiring a detailed analysis of several parts of the Federal AviationRegulations, might warrant written argument or briefs. Therefore, writtenargument or written posthearing briefs should be filed if the parties agreeto take on the extra burden of preparing and submitting written briefsor if the administrative law judge requests written briefs or argumentsto address complex or unusual issues in a particular case. Section 13.232 states the requirements for an initial decision issued byan administrative law judge in civil penalty actions. The initial decisionmust include, among other things, findings of fact, conclusions of law,the grounds that support these findings and conclusions, determinationsof the credibility of witnesses, and a discussion of the basis for rulingsof the administrative law judge during the hearing. The FAA believes thatrequiring a detailed discussion of the basis for the decision will guaranteethat the parties have full and complete information to decide whether toappeal and, if so, on what basis to appeal. The rule also requires that the administrative law judge provide copiesof any unpublished or unreported initial decision referenced in an initialdecision to the parties and to the FAA decisionmaker. This section providesaccess by the parties and the FAA decisionmaker to information, otherwiseunavailable, that served as a basis for an initial decision. The FAA believesthat this information will help the parties evaluate the necessity of anappeal and will help the FAA decisionmaker understand the basis for theinitial decision. The initial decision also must include a determination of the reasonablenessof the civil penalty contained in the order of civil penalty. It is clearthat the agency attorney must explain the basis for the civil penalty inorder for the administrative law judge to make such a determination. Forexample, pursuant to statutory mandate, the agency attorney considers allinformation known to the agency, and all information submitted by an individual,before issuing an order of civil penalty. The Federal Aviation Act givesthe FAA the authority to ensure aviation safety by promulgating and enforcingsafety regulations and providing appropriate sanctions for violations ofthose regulations. The FAA's determination of a civil penalty, to deterviolations of the safety regulations, should be given deference to encouragecompliance and to ensure a sufficient deterrent effect. If the administrativelaw judge affirms the order of civil penalty but reduces the amount ofthe civil penalty, the administrative law judge should state why the reductionis appropriate. The FAA believes that requiring an explanation for anyreduced sanction is critical for consideration of any appeal of the reductionand determination of civil penalties in future actions. In the majority of cases, the administrative law judge is not requiredto issue a written decision. The administrative law judge is entitled,and is encouraged, to issue an initial decision orally; a written decisionshould be reserved for clearly complex or unusual cases. The FAA believesthat the freedom and ability to issue oral decisions will greatly reducethe time required to resolve the issues addressed during the hearing. Inaddition, the FAA anticipates that an oral decision may help reduce thetime and expense for the parties and may reduce the adjudicatory burdenon the administrative law judge. Section 13.233 contains the procedures that a party must follow to filean appeal of the administrative law judge's initial decision with the FAAdecisionmaker. The basis for appeal by a party to the FAA decisionmakerhas been circumscribed in these rules because the flexible hearing processprovided in these rules will result in a full and complete analysis ofthe facts in a civil penalty action. The FAA believes that limiting thebasis upon which a party may appeal an initial decision will preclude frivolousand unnecessary appeals of initial decisions that merely delay the proceedingsand decrease the deterrent effect of civil penalty. However, the rulespreserve the FAA decisionmaker's discretion to take any action that theFAA decisionmaker determines may be necessary to resolve an issue on appeal.If a party appeals an initial decision, the party is required to file anotice of appeal and an appeal brief. The party must include the page numbersfrom the transcript in an appellate brief if he or she relies on evidenceor information contained in the transcript for the appeal. An opposingparty may file a reply brief in an appeal. A party may not submit additionalbriefs unless specifically permitted by the FAA decisionmaker. The ruleprohibits a party from submitting any additional brief until that partyhas obtained permission from the FAA decisionmaker. There is no right tooral argument on appeal. Oral argument will be permitted only if the FAAdecisionmaker finds that oral argument is necessary to develop the issueson appeal.Section 13.233 also provides that only a final decision and order of theAdministrator, issued after appeal of an initial decision, is precedentin subsequent civil penalty actions. The rule also provides that any portionof an initial decision that has not been appealed is not precedent in anyother civil penalty action. Neither an administrative law judge nor theFAA decisionmaker is required to decide an issue in conformity with anyprevious, unappealed initial decision that did not result in a final decisionand order of the Administrator. This section is not intended to precludean administrative law judge from using similar reasoning or analysis insimilar civil penalty actions. Section 13.234 allows a party to request that the FAA decisionmaker reconsideror modify the final decision and order of the Administrator on appeal.The FAA decisionmaker is not required to accept any petition to reconsideror to modify any decision. The rule provides that the Administrator willnot reconsider or modify any decision that was not appealed to the FAAdecisionmaker under these rules. The FAA decisionmaker will issue the decision and order of the Administratorafter a party has appealed the administrative law judge's initial decisionto the FAA decisionmaker. Decisions that have been appealed to the FAAdecisionmaker and result in a decision and order of the Administrator constitutefinal orders of the Administrator that may be appealed to courts of appealsof the United States or the Court of Appeals for the District of Columbiapursuant section 1006 of the Federal Aviation Act. <ITAG tagnum="84">Reason for No Notice and Immediate Adoption </ITAG>These rules are needed immediately to implement the statutory authoritygiven to the FAA in Pub. L. 100-223, signed by the President on December30, 1987. The amendments enable the FAA to assess civil penalties for violationsarising under the Federal Aviation Act, or a rule, regulation, or orderissued thereunder, upon written notice and finding of violation by theAdministrator. The legislation requires that civil penalty actions initiatedunder this authority be assessed only after notice and an opportunity fora hearing on the record in accordance with section 554 of the AdministrativeProcedure Act. The authority granted to the FAA by the amended legislationis effective only until December 30, 1989. The amendment to the Federal Aviation Act requires the Administrator toset up a ``Civil Penalty Assessment Demonstration Program'' to study theeffectiveness of the amendment. The legislation also requires the FAA toreport to Congress, no later than June 30, 1989, on the results of thestudy required by the legislation. The FAA reviewed the existing proceduralrules governing enforcement hearings and determined that these proceduresare inadequate to provide the appropriate level of procedural formalitydictated by Congress in the legislation. For these reasons, notice andpublic comment procedures are impracticable, unnecessary, and contraryto the public interest. Moreover, good cause exists to make these proceduralrules effective in less than 30 days. In accordance with the DOT RegulatoryPolicies and Procedures, an opportunity for public comment on the finalrule is provided. <ITAG tagnum="84">Economic Assessment </ITAG>Because of the emergency need for these procedural rules, and in accordancewith section 8(a)(1) of Executive Order 12291, I find that it is impracticableto follow the procedures of the Executive Order. For the same reason, afull regulatory evaluation has not been prepared prior to publication ofthis final rule. In accordance with section 11(a) of the DOT RegulatoryPolicies and Procedures, a regulatory evaluation will be prepared, if necessary,and placed in the public docket, unless an exception is granted by theSecretary of Transportation. The rules contained in this final rule are purely procedural rules of practicethat will govern hearings requested by persons subject to FAA civil penaltyaction. The FAA can not anticipate the number of persons who may requesta hearing after an order of civil penalty has been issued by the FAA. Thehearings conducted pursuant to these rules provide an alternative to theprior procedure of referring these actions to the United States Attorneyfor prosecution of a civil penalty action in a United States District Court.For these reasons, the FAA anticipates that the cost, if any, of complyingwith these procedural rules would be minimal. Therefore, it is certified,according to the criteria of the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980, thatthis final rule will not have a significant economic impact, positive ornegative, on a substantial number of small entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Implications </ITAG>This amendment would not have substantial direct effects on the States,on the relationship between the national government and the States, oron the distribution of power and responsibilities among the various levelsof government. Thus, in accordance with Executive Order 12612, preparationof a Federalism Assessment is not warranted. <ITAG tagnum="84">Conclusion </ITAG>The FAA has determined that this amendment is not a major regulation underExecutive Order 12291 and that it is not a significant regulation underthe Regulatory Policies and Procedures of the Department of Transportation.In accordance with section 8(a)(1) of Executive Order 12291, due to theemergency need for these procedural rules, the procedures in that ExecutiveOrder have not been followed. For the reasons discussed above, the FAAalso has determined that these rules will not have a significant economicimpact, positive or negative, on a substantial number of small entities.A copy of any regulatory evaluation prepared for this final rule will beplaced in the public docket unless an exception is granted by the Secretaryof Transportation. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 14 CFR Part 13 </ITAG>Enforcement procedures, Investigations, Penalties.<ITAG tagnum="84">The Amendments </ITAG>Accordingly, the Federal Aviation Administration amends Part 13 of theFederal Aviation Regulations (14 CFR Part 13), effective September 7, 1988as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 13_INVESTIGATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT PROCEDURES </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 13 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354 (a) and (c), 1374(d), 1401-1406, 1421-1428,1471, 1475, 1481, 1482 (a), (b), and (c), and 1484-1489 (Federal AviationAct of 1958) (as amended, 49 U.S.C. App. 1475, Airport and Airway Safetyand Capacity Expansion Act of 1987); 49 U.S.C. App. 1655(c) (Departmentof Transportation Act) (Revised, 49 U.S.C. 106(g)); 49 U.S.C. 1808, 1809,and 1810 (Hazardous Materials Transportation Act); 49 U.S.C. 1727 and 1730(Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970); 49 U.S.C. 2218 and 2219 (Airportand Airway Improvement Act of 1982); 49 U.S.C. 2201 (as amended, 49 U.S.C.App. 2218, Airport and Airway Safety and Capacity Expansion Act of 1987);18 U.S.C. 6002 and 6004 (Organized Crime Control Act of 1970); 49 CFR 1.47(f), (k), and (q) (Regulations of the Office of the Secretary of Transportation).</ITAG>2. Section 13.15 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Civil penalties: Federal Aviation Act of 1958 involving an amountin controversy in excess of $50,000; an in rem action; seizure of aircraft;or injunctive relief. </ITAG>(a) The following penalties apply to persons who violate the Federal AviationAct of l958, as amended: (1) Any person who violates any provision of Title III, V, VI, or XII ofthe Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, or any rule, regulation,or order issued thereunder, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than$1000 for each violation, in accordance with section 901 of the FederalAviation Act of 1958, as amended (49 U.S.C. 1471, <T3>et seq.</T3>). (2) Any person who violates section 404(d) of the Federal Aviation Actof 1958, as amended, or any rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder,is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 for each violation,in accordance with section 901 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, asamended (49 U.S.C. 1471, <T3>et seq.</T3>). (3) Any person who operates aircraft for the carriage of persons or propertyfor compensation or hire (other than an airman serving in the capacityof an airman) is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 foreach violation of Title III, VI, or XII of the Federal Aviation Act of1958, as amended, or any rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder,occurring after December 30, 1987, in accordance with section 901 of theFederal Aviation Act of l958, as amended (49 U.S.C. 1471 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (b) The authority of the Administrator, under section 901 of the FederalAviation Act of 1958, as amended, to propose a civil penalty for a violationof that Act, or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder, and theability to refer cases to the United States Attorney General, or the delegateof the Attorney General, for prosecution of civil penalty actions proposedby the Administrator, involving an amount in controversy in excess of $50,000,an <T3>in rem </T3>action, seizure of aircraft subject to lien, or suit forinjunctive relief, or for collection of an assessed civil penalty, is delegatedto the Chief Counsel, the Assistant Chief Counsel for Regulations and Enforcement,and the Assistant Chief Counsel for a region or center. (c) The Administrator may compromise any civil penalty, proposed in accordancewith section 901 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, involvingan amount in controversy in excess of $50,000, an <T3>in rem </T3>action, seizure of aircraft subject to lien, or suit forinjunctive relief, prior to referral of the civil penalty action to theUnited States Attorney General, or the delegate of the Attorney General,for prosecution. (1) The Administrator, through the Chief Counsel, the Assistant Chief Counselfor Regulations and Enforcement, and the Assistant Chief Counsel for aregion or center, sends a civil penalty letter to the person charged witha violation of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, or a rule,regulation, or order issued thereunder. The civil penalty letter containsa statement of the charges, the applicable law, rule, regulation, or order,the amount of civil penalty that the Administrator will accept in fullsettlement of the action or an offer to compromise the civil penalty. (2) Not later than 30 days after receipt of the civil penalty letter, theperson charged with a violation may present any material or informationin answer to the charges to the agency attorney, either orally or in writing,that may explain, mitigate, or deny the violation or that may show extenuatingcircumstances. The Administrator will consider any material or informationsubmitted in accordance with this paragraph to determine whether the personis subject to a civil penalty or to determine the amount for which theAdministrator will compromise the action. (3) If the person charged with the violation offers to compromise for aspecific amount, that person shall send a certified check or money orderfor that amount, payable to the Federal Aviation Administration, to theagency attorney. The Chief Counsel, the Assistant Chief Counsel for Regulationsand Enforcement, or the Assistant Chief Counsel for a region or center,may accept the certified check or money order or may refuse and returnthe certified check or money order. (4) If the offer to compromise is accepted by the Administrator, the agencyattorney will send a letter to the person charged with the violation statingthat the certified check or money order is accepted in full settlementof the civil penalty action. (5) If the parties cannot agree to compromise the civil penalty actionor the offer to compromise is rejected and the certified check or moneyorder submitted in compromise is returned, the Administrator may referthe civil penalty action to the United States Attorney General, or thedelegate of the Attorney General, to begin proceedings in a United StatesDistrict Court, pursuant to the authority in section 903 of the FederalAviation Act, as amended (49 U.S.C. l473), to prosecute and collect thecivil penalty. 3. Section 13.16 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Civil Penalties: Federal Aviation Act of 1958, involving an amountin controversy not exceeding $50,000; Hazardous Materials TransportationAct. </ITAG>(a) The following penalties apply to persons who violate the Federal AviationAct of 1958, as amended, and the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act:(1) Any person who violates any provision of Title III, V, VI, or XII ofthe Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, or any rule, regulation,or order issued thereunder, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than$1,000 for each violation, in accordance with section 901 of the FederalAviation Act of 1958, as amended (49 U.S.C. 1471, <T3>et seq.</T3>).(2) Any person who violates section 404(d) of the Federal Aviation Actof 1958, as amended, or any rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder,is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 for each violation,in accordance with section 901 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, asamended, (49 U.S.C. 1471 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (3) Any person who operates aircraft for the carriage of persons or propertyfor compensation or hire (other than an airman serving in the capacityof an airman) is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 foreach violation of Title III, VI, or XII of the Federal Aviation Act of1958, as amended, or any rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder,occurring after December 30, 1987, in accordance with section 901 of theFederal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, (49 U.S.C. 1471 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (4) Any person who knowingly commits an act in violation of the HazardousMaterials Transportation Act, or any rule, regulation, or order issuedthereunder is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for eachviolation, in accordance with section 901 of the Federal Aviation Act of1958, as amended, and section 110 of the Hazardous Materials TransportationAct (49 U.S.C. 1471 and 1809 <T3>et seq.</T3>). An order assessing civil penalty for a violation underthe Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or a rule, regulation, or orderissued thereunder, will be issued only after consideration of_ (i) The nature and circumstances of the violation; (ii) The extent and gravity of the violation; (iii) The person's degree of culpability; (iv) The person's history of prior violations; (v) The person's ability to pay the civil penalty; (vi) The effect on the person's ability to continue in business; and (vii) Such other matters as justice may require. (b) An order assessing civil penalty may be issued for a violation describedin paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), and (a)(4) of this section afternotice and opportunity for a hearing. (c) The authority of the Administrator, under sections 901 and andSection;905 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, and section 110 ofthe Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, to initiate and assess civilpenalties for a violation of those Acts, or a rule, regulation, or orderissued thereunder and the authority under section 901 of the Federal AviationAct of 1958, as amended, and the ability to refer cases to the United StatesAttorney General, or the delegate of the Attorney General, for collectionof assessed civil penalties, is delegated to the Chief Counsel, the AssistantChief Counsel for Regulations and Enforcement, and the Assistant ChiefCounsel for a region or center. (d) <T3>Notice of proposed civil penalty. </T3>A civil penalty action is initiatedby sending a notice of proposed civil penalty to the person charged witha violation of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, the HazardousMaterials Transportation Act, or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder.The notice of proposed civil penalty contains a statement of the chargesand the amount of the proposed civil penalty. (e) <T3>Procedures following receipt of notice of proposed civil penalty. </T3>Notlater than 30 days after receipt of the notice of proposed civil penalty,the person charged with a violation shall do one of the following: (1) The person shall submit the amount of the proposed civil penalty inwhich case an order assessing civil penalty shall be issued in that amount.(2) The person shall participate in the informal procedures provided inparagraph (f) of this section. (3) The person shall request a hearing, pursuant to paragraph (i) of thissection, in which case an order of civil penalty shall be issued and shallbe filed with the hearing docket clerk as the complaint in the proceedings.(f) <T3>Informal procedures. </T3>Not later than 30 days after receipt of thenotice of proposed civil penalty, the person charged with a violation,who wants to participate in informal procedures, shall do one of the following:(1) The person shall submit any information, including documents and witnessstatements, in writing, to the agency attorney, demonstrating that a violationof the regulations did not occur or that the penalty or the amount of thepenalty is not warranted by the circumstances. (2) The person shall submit a written request to the agency attorney toreduce the proposed civil penalty and shall submit, in writing, the reasonsand documents supporting the reduction of the proposed civil penalty, includingrecords indicating a financial inability to pay or records showing thatpayment of the proposed civil penalty would prevent the person from continuingin business, or (3) The person shall submit a written request to the agency attorney foran informal conference to discuss the matter with the agency attorney andto submit relevant information or documents to the agency attorney. (g) <T3>Procedures following interim reply or informal conference. </T3>Notlater than 10 days after the person charged with a violation receives aninterim reply to any submission made in accordance with paragraphs (f)(1)or (f)(2) or not later than 10 days after an informal conference, the personcharged with the violation shall do one of the following: (1) The person shall submit the amount of the proposed civil penalty inwhich case an order assessing civil penalty shall be issued in that amount.(2) The person shall submit additional written information to the agencyattorney for consideration. (3) The person shall request a hearing, pursuant to paragraph (i) of thissection, in which case an order of civil penalty shall be issued and shallbe filed with the hearing docket clerk as the complaint in the proceedings.(h) <T3>Order of civil penalty. </T3>An order of civil penalty shall be issuedif the person charged with a violation requests a hearing in accordancewith paragraph (e)(3) or paragraph (g)(3) of this section. (i) <T3>Request for a hearing. </T3>Any person who receives a notice of proposedcivil penalty may request a hearing, pursuant to paragraph (e)(3) or paragraph(g)(3) of this section, to be conducted in accordance with the proceduresin Subpart G of this part. A person requesting a hearing shall file a writtenrequest for a hearing with the agency attorney. The request for a hearingmay be in the form of a letter but must be dated and signed by the personrequesting a hearing. The request for a hearing may be typewritten or maybe legibly handwritten. A person requesting a hearing shall include a suggestedlocation for the hearing in the request for a hearing. (j) <T3>Order assessing civil penalty. </T3>An order assessing civil penaltyshall be issued if the person charged with a violation_ (1) Submits the amount of the proposed civil penalty in which case theorder assessing civil penalty shall reflect receipt of the civil penalty;(2) Does not respond in a timely manner to the notice of proposed civilpenalty;(3) Does not respond in a timely manner to interim replies from the agencyattorney under paragraph (g) of this section; or (4) Does not comply with any agreement reached between the parties duringan informal conference. (k) <T3>Payment. </T3>A person charged with a violation may pay the amountof the civil penalty proposed in the notice or stated in the order, oran amount agreed upon, by sending a certified check or money order, payableto the Federal Aviation Administration, to the agency attorney. (l) <T3>Hearing. </T3>If the person charged with the violation requests a hearingpursuant to paragraph (e)(3) or paragraph (g)(3) of this section, the orderof civil penalty shall be issued and shall be filed with the hearing docketclerk as the complaint in the proceedings. The procedural rules in SubpartG of this part apply to the hearing and any appeal. At the close of thehearing, the administrative law judge shall issue, either orally on therecord or in writing, an initial decision, including the reasons for thedecision, that affirms, modifies, or reverses the order of civil penalty.An order of civil penalty, as affirmed or modified by the administrativelaw judge, shall become an order assessing civil penalty if a party doesnot appeal the administrative law judge's initial decision to the FAA decisionmaker.(m) <T3>Appeal. </T3>Either party may appeal the administrative law judge'sinitial decision to the FAA decisionmaker pursuant to the procedures inSubpart G of this part. If a party files a notice of appeal pursuant toandSection; 13.233 of Subpart G, the effectiveness of any order assessingcivil penalty is stayed until a final decision and order of the Administratorhas been entered on the record. The FAA decisionmaker shall review therecord of the hearing and issue a final decision and order of the Administratorthat affirms, modifies, or reverses the order assessing civil penalty.The FAA decisionmaker shall not assess a civil penalty in an amount greaterthan the amount stated in the order of civil penalty. (n) <T3>Exhaustion of administrative remedies. </T3>A party may only appeala final decision and order of the Administrator to the courts of appealsof the United States or the United States Court of Appeals for the Districtof Columbia pursuant to section 1006 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958,as amended. An order or an initial decision of an administrative law judge,that has not been appealed to the FAA decisionmaker, does not constitutea final order of the Administrator for the purposes of judicial appellatereview under section 1006 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended.(o) If a person subject to an order assessing civil penalty does not paythe assessed civil penalty within 60 days after service of the order assessingcivil penalty, the Administrator may refer the order to the United StatesAttorney General, or the delegate of the Attorney General, to begin proceedingsin a United States District Court, pursuant to the authority in section903 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended (49 U.S.C. 1473), orsection 110 of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (49 U.S.C. 1809),to collect the civil penalty. (p) <T3>Compromise. </T3>The Administrator may compromise any civil penalty,assessed in accordance with sections 901 and 905 of the Federal AviationAct of 1958, as amended, involving an amount in controversy not exceeding$50,000, or any civil penalty assessed in accordance with section 901 ofthe Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, and section 110 of the HazardousMaterials Transportation Act, at any time prior to referring the orderassessing civil penalty to the United States attorney for collection. 4. Section 13.31 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability. </ITAG>This subpart applies to proceedings in which a hearing has been requestedin accordance with andSection;andSection; 13.19(c)(5), 13.20(c), 13.20(d),13.75(a)(2), 13.75(b), or 13.81(e).<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 13_INVESTIGATIVE AND ENFORCEMENT PROCEDURES </ITAG>5. Part 13 is amended by adding a new Subpart G to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Rules of Practice in FAA Civil Penalty Actions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.201 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.202 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.203 Separation of functions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.204 Appearances and rights of parties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.205 Administrative law judges. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.206 Intervention. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.207 Certification of documents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.208 Complaint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.209 Answer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.210 Filing of documents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.211 Service of documents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.212 Computation of time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.213 Extension of time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.214 Amendment of pleadings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.215 Withdrawal of a complaint or request for a hearing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.216 Waivers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.217 Joint procedural or discovery schedule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.218 Motions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.219 Interlocutory appeals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.220 Discovery. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.221 Notice of hearing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.222 Evidence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.223 Standard of proof. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.224 Burden of proof. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.225 Offer of proof. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.226 Public disclosure of evidence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.227 Testimony by agency employees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.228 Subpoenas. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.229 Witness fees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.230 Record. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.231 Argument before the administrative law judge. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.232 Initial decision. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.233 Appeals from initial decisions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.234 Petitions to reconsider or modify a final decision and orderof the FAA decisionmaker on appeal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.235 Judicial review of final decision and order.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Rules of Practice in FAA Civil Penalty Actions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Applicability. </ITAG>(a) This subpart applies to the following actions: (1) A civil penalty action, initiated after September 7, 1988, in whichan order of civil penalty has been issued not exceeding $50,000 for a violationarising under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, (49 U.S.C.1301 <T3>et seq.</T3>), or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder. (2) A civil penalty action initiated after September 7, 1988, in whichan order of civil penalty has been issued for a violation arising underthe Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended (49 U.S.C. 1471 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (49 U.S.C.1801 <T3>et seq.</T3>), or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder. (b) This subpart applies only to proceedings initiated after September7, 1988. All other cases, hearings, or other proceedings pending or inprogress at the time this subpart is effective are not affected by therules in this subpart. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this section, theUnited States district courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction of anycivil penalty action initiated by the Administrator_ (1) Which involves an amount in controversy in excess of $50,000; (2) Which is an <T3>in rem </T3>action or in which an <T3>in rem </T3>action based on the same violation has been brought; (3) Regarding which an aircraft subject to lien has been seized by theUnited States; and (4) In which a suit for injunctive relief based on the violation givingrise to the civil penalty has also been brought. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions. </ITAG>``Administrative law judge'' means an administrative law judge appointedpursuant to the provisions of 5 U.S.C. 3105. ``Agency attorney'' means the Assistant Chief Counsel for Regulations andEnforcement, the Assistant Chief Counsel for a region or center, or anattorney designated to prosecute a case. An agency attorney shall not includeany attorney who advises the FAA decisionmaker regarding an initial decisionor any appeal to the FAA decisionmaker or who is supervised by a personwho provides advice to the FAA decisionmaker in a case. ``Attorney'' means a person licensed by a state, the District of Columbia,or a territory of the United States to practice law or appear before thecourts of that state or territory. ``Complaint'' means an order of civil penalty issued pursuant to the FederalAviation Act of 1958, as amended, or a rule, regulation, or order issuedthereunder, or the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or a rule, regulation,or order issued thereunder, which has been filed with the Hearing Docketafter a hearing has been requested. ``FAA decisionmaker'' means the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration,acting in the capacity of the decisionmaker on appeal, or any person towhom the Administrator has delegated the Administrator's decisionmakingauthority in a civil penalty action. As used in this subpart, the FAA decisionmakeris the official authorized to issue a final decision and order of the Administratorin a civil penalty action. ``Mail'' includes U.S. certified mail, U.S. registered mail, or use ofan overnight express courier service. ``Order assessing civil penalty'' means an order that contains a findingor determination of violation arising under the Federal Aviation Act, asamended, or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder, or a violationof the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or a rule, regulation, ororder issued thereunder, and directs a person to pay a civil penalty forthe violation. ``Order of civil penalty'' means an order issued after a person requestsa hearing pursuant to andSection; 13.16(e)(3) or 13.16(g)(3) of this partand which is filed with the docket clerk as the complaint in the proceedings.``Party'' means the agency attorney or the respondent named in an orderof civil penalty.``Personal delivery'' includes hand-delivery or use of a contract or expressmessenger service. ``Personal delivery'' does not include use of governmentinteroffice mail service. ``Pleading'' means a complaint, an answer, and any amendment of these documentspermitted under this subpart. ``Properly addressed'' means a document that shows an address containedin FAA records, a residential, business, or other address submitted bya person on any document provided by this subpart, or any other addressshown by other reasonable and available means. ``Respondent'' means a person to whom a civil penalty is directed and whohas received an order of civil penalty. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separation of functions. </ITAG>(a) Civil penalty proceedings, including hearings, shall be prosecutedby an agency attorney. (b) Any agency attorney engaged in the performance of prosecutorial functionsin a case shall not, in that case or a factually related case, participatein, or advise the FAA decisionmaker regarding, an initial decision or anyappeal to the FAA decisionmaker under this subpart, except as a witnessor counsel in public proceedings. The prohibition described in this paragraphshall begin at the time that a notice of proposed civil penalty is issued.(c) The Chief Counsel shall not perform prosecutorial functions in a caseand shall not supervise the agency attorney in the performance of prosecutorialfunctions in a case. The prohibitions described in this paragraph shallbegin at the time that the notice of proposed civil penalty is issued.(d) The Chief Counsel or the delegate of the Chief Counsel, other thanindividuals described in paragraph (a) of this section, shall advise theFAA decisionmaker regarding an initial decision or any appeal to the FAAdecisionmaker under this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.204</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appearances and rights of parties. </ITAG>(a) Any party may appear and be heard in person. (b) Any party may be accompanied, represented, or advised by an attorneyor representative designated by the party and may be examined by that attorneyor representative in any proceeding governed by this subpart. An attorneyor representative who represents a party may file a notice of appearancein the action, in the manner provided in andSection; 13.210 of this subpart,and shall serve a copy of the notice of appearance on each party, in themanner provided in andSection; 13.211 of this subpart, before participatingin any proceeding governed by this subpart. The attorney or representativeshall include the name, address, and telephone number of the attorney orrepresentative in the notice of appearance. (c) Any person may request a copy of a document upon payment of reasonablecosts. A person may keep an original document, data, or evidence, withthe consent of the administrative law judge, by substituting a legiblecopy of the document for the record. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administrative law judges. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Powers of an administrative law judge. </T3>In accordance with therules of this subpart, an administrative law judge may_ (1) Give notice of, and hold, prehearing conferences and hearings; (2) Administer oaths and affirmations; (3) Issue subpoenas authorized by law and issue notices of deposition requestedby the parties; (4) Rule on offers of proof; (5) Receive relevant and material evidence; (6) Regulate the course of the hearing in accordance with the rules ofthis subpart; (7) Hold conferences to settle or to simplify the issues by consent ofthe parties; (8) Dispose of procedural motions and requests; and (9) Make findings of fact and conclusions of law, and issue an initialdecision. (b) <T3>Limitations on the power of the administrative law judge. </T3>Theadministrative law judge shall not issue an order of contempt, award coststo any party, or impose any sanction not specified in this subpart. Ifthe administrative law judge imposes any sanction not specified in thissubpart, a party may file an interlocutory appeal of right with the FAAdecisionmaker pursuant to andSection; 13.219(c)(4) of this subpart. Thissection does not preclude an administrative law judge from issuing an orderthat bars a person from a specific proceeding based on a finding of obstreperousor disruptive behavior in that specific proceeding. (c) <T3>Disqualification. </T3>The administrative law judge may disqualifyhimself or herself at any time. A party may file a motion, pursuant toandSection; 13.218(f)(6), requesting that an administrative law judge bedisqualified from the proceedings. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Intervention. </ITAG>(a) Any person who has a statutory right to participate in the proceedingsshall be allowed to intervene in the proceedings by the administrativelaw judge. (b) In all other cases, the administrative law judge shall not allow anyperson to intervene in any proceeding governed by this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certification of documents. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Signature required. </T3>The attorney of record, the party, or theparty's representative shall sign each document tendered for filing withthe hearing docket clerk, the administrative law judge, the FAA decisionmakeron appeal, or served on each party.(b) <T3>Effect of signing a document. </T3>By signing a document, the attorneyof record, the party, or the party's representative certifies that theattorney or party has read the document and, based on reasonable inquiryand to the best of the attorney or party's knowledge, information, andbelief, the document is_ (1) Consistent with these rules; (2) Warranted by existing law or that a good faith argument exists forextension, modification, or reversal of existing law; and (3) Not unreasonable or unduly burdensome or expensive, not made to harassany person, not made to cause unnecessary delay, not made to cause needlessincrease in the cost of the proceedings, or for any other improper purpose.(c) <T3>Sanctions. </T3>If the attorney of record, the party, or the party'srepresentative signs a document in violation of this section, the administrativelaw judge or the FAA decisionmaker shall_ (1) Strike the pleading signed in violation of this section; (2) Strike the request for discovery or the discovery response signed inviolation of this section and preclude further discovery by the party;(3) Deny the motion or request signed in violation of this section; (4) Exclude the document signed in violation of this section from the record;(5) Dismiss the interlocutory appeal and preclude further appeal on thatissue by the party who filed the appeal until an initial decision has beenentered on the record; or (6) Dismiss the appeal of the administrative law judge's initial decisionto the FAA decisionmaker. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.208</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Complaint. </ITAG>(a) In accordance with andSection;andSection; 13.16(e)(3) and 13.16(g)(3),an order of civil penalty shall serve as the complaint. The agency attorneyshall serve the original order of civil penalty on the person requestingthe hearing. (b) The agency attorney shall file the complaint, attaching a copy of therequest for a hearing, and shall suggest a location for the hearing, withthe hearing docket clerk not later than 20 days after receipt of a person'srequest for hearing. (c) If the agency attorney and the person requesting the hearing do notagree on the location for the hearing, the hearing docket clerk shall assigna hearing location near the place where the incident occurred. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.209</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Answer. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Writing required. </T3>A person who receives an order of civil penaltyshall file a written answer to the order, or a motion pursuant to andSection;13.218(f)(1-4) of this subpart, not later than 30 days after service ofthe order of civil penalty. The answer may be in the form of a letter butmust be dated and signed by the person responding to the order of civilpenalty. An answer may be typewritten or may be legibly handwritten. (b) <T3>Filing and address. </T3>A person filing an answer shall personallydeliver or mail the answer for filing with the hearing docket clerk tothe Hearing Docket, Federal Aviation Administration, 800 Independence AvenueSW., Room 914E, Washington, DC 20591, Attn: Hearing Docket Clerk. (c) <T3>Contents. </T3>A person filing an answer shall include a brief statementof the relief requested by the person in the answer. The person shall includespecifically any affirmative defense in the answer that the person intendsto assert at the hearing. (d) <T3>Specific denial of allegations required. </T3>A person filing an answershall admit, deny, or state that the person is without sufficient knowledgeor information to admit or deny each allegation in each numbered paragraphof the order of civil penalty. A general denial of the order of civil penaltyis deemed a failure to file an answer. Any statement or allegation containedin the order of civil penalty that is not specifically denied in the answeris deemed an admission of the truth of that allegation. (e) <T3>Service. </T3>A person filing an answer shall comply with the servicerequirements of andSection; 13.211 of this subpart. (f) <T3>Failure to file answer. </T3>A person's failure to file an answer withoutgood cause is deemed an admission of the truth of each allegation containedin the order of civil penalty and an order assessing civil penalty shallbe issued. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Filing of documents. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Address and method of filing. </T3>A person tendering a document forfiling shall personally deliver or mail the signed original and one copyof each document to the Hearing Docket, Federal Aviation Administration,800 Independence Avenue SW., Room 914E, Washington, DC 20591, Attn: HearingDocket Clerk. After an administrative law judge has been assigned to theproceedings, a person shall personally deliver or mail the signed originalof each document to the hearing docket clerk and shall serve a copy ofeach document on each party and the administrative law judge. (b) <T3>Date of filing. </T3>A document shall be considered to be filed onthe date of personal delivery; or if mailed, the mailing date shown onthe certificate of service, the date shown on the postmark if there isno certificate of service, or other mailing date shown by other evidenceif there is no certificate of service or postmark. (c) <T3>Form. </T3>Each document shall be typewritten or legibly handwritten.(d) <T3>Contents. </T3>Unless otherwise specified in this subpart, each documentmust contain a short, plain statement of the facts on which the person'scase rests and a brief statement of the action requested in the document.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.211</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Service of documents. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>A person shall serve a copy of any document filed withthe Hearing Docket on the administrative law judge and on each party atthe time of filing. (b) <T3>Type of service. </T3>A person may serve documents by personal deliveryor by mail. (c) <T3>Certificate of service. </T3>A person may attach a certificate of serviceto a document tendered for filing with the hearing docket clerk. A certificateof service shall consist of a statement, dated and signed by the personfiling the document, that the document was personally delivered or mailedto each party on a specific date. (d) <T3>Date of service. </T3>The date of service shall be the date of personaldelivery; or if mailed, the mailing date shown on the certificate of service,the date shown on the postmark if there is no certificate of service, orother mailing date shown by other evidence if there is no certificate ofservice or postmark. (e) <T3>Additional time after service by mail. </T3>Whenever a party has aright or a duty to act or to make any response within a prescribed periodafter service by mail, or on a date certain after service by mail, 5 daysshall be added to the prescribed period.(f) <T3>Service by the administrative law judge. </T3>The administrative lawjudge shall serve a copy of each document including, but not limited to,notices of prehearing conferences and hearings, rulings on motions, decisions,and orders, upon each party to the proceedings by personal delivery orby mail. (g) <T3>Valid service. </T3>A document that was properly addressed, was sentin accordance with this subpart, and that was returned, that was not claimed,or that was refused, is deemed to have been served in accordance with thissubpart. The service shall be considered valid as of the date and the timethat the document was deposited with a contract or express messenger, thedocument was mailed, or personal delivery of the document was refused.(h) <T3>Presumption of service. </T3>There shall be a presumption of servicewhere a party or a person, who customarily receives mail, or receives itin the ordinary course of business, at either the person's residence orthe person's principal place of business, acknowledges receipt of the document.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.212</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of time. </ITAG>(a) This section applies to any period of time prescribed or allowed bythis subpart, by notice or order of the administrative law judge, or byany applicable statute. (b) The date of an act, event, or default, after which a designated timeperiod begins to run, is not included in a computation of time under thissubpart. (c) The last day of a time period is included in a computation of timeunless it is a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday. If the last day ofthe time period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the time periodruns until the end of the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legalholiday. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.213</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Extension of time. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Oral requests. </T3>The parties may reasonably agree to extend thetime for filing a document under this subpart. If the parties agree, theadministrative law judge shall grant one extension of time to each party.The party seeking the extension of time shall submit a draft order to theadministrative law judge to be signed by the administrative law judge andfiled with the hearing docket clerk. The administrative law judge may grantadditional oral requests for an extension of time where the parties agreeto the extension. (b) <T3>Written motion. </T3>A party shall file a written motion for an extensionof time with the administrative law judge not later than 7 days beforethe document is due unless good cause for the late filing is shown. A partyfiling a written motion for an extension of time shall serve a copy ofthe motion on each party. The administrative law judge may grant the extensionof time if good cause for the extension is shown. (c) <T3>Failure to rule. </T3>If the administrative law judge fails to ruleon a written motion for an extension of time by the date the document wasdue, the motion for an extension of time is deemed granted for no morethan 20 days after the original date the document was to be filed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.214</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendment of pleadings. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Filing and service. </T3>A party shall file the amendment with theadministrative law judge and shall serve a copy of the amendment on allparties to the proceeding. (b) <T3>Time. </T3>A party shall file an amendment to a complaint or an answerwithin the following: (1) Not later than 15 days before the scheduled date of a hearing, a partymay amend a complaint or an answer without the consent of the administrativelaw judge. (2) Less than 15 days before the scheduled date of a hearing, the administrativelaw judge may allow amendment of a complaint or an answer only for goodcause shown in a motion to amend. (c) <T3>Responses. </T3>The administrative law judge shall allow a reasonabletime, but not more than 20 days from the date of filing, for other partiesto respond if an amendment to a complaint, answer, or other pleading hasbeen filed with the administrative law judge. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Withdrawal of a complaint or request for a hearing. </ITAG>At any time before or during a hearing, the agency attorney may withdrawa complaint or a party may withdraw a request for a hearing without theconsent of the administrative law judge. If the agency attorney withdrawsthe complaint or a party withdraws the request for a hearing and the answer,the administrative law judge shall dismiss the proceedings in this subpartwith prejudice. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.216</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waivers. </ITAG>Waivers of any rights provided by statute or regulation shall be in writingor by stipulation made at a hearing and entered into the record. The partiesshall set forth the precise terms of the waiver and any conditions. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.217</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Joint procedural or discovery schedule. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The parties may agree to submit a schedule for filingall prehearing motions, a schedule for conducting discovery in the proceedings,or a schedule that will govern all prehearing motions and discovery inthe proceedings. (b) <T3>Form and content of schedule. </T3>If the parties agree to a jointprocedural or discovery schedule, one of the parties shall file the jointschedule with the administrative law judge, setting forth the dates towhich the parties have agreed, and shall serve a copy of the joint scheduleon each party.(1) The joint schedule may include, but need not be limited to, requestsfor discovery, any objections to discovery requests, responses to discoveryrequests to which there are no objections, submission of prehearing motions,responses to prehearing motions, exchange of exhibits to be introducedat the hearing, and a list of witnesses that may be called at the hearing.(2) Each party shall sign the original joint schedule to be filed withthe administrative law judge. (c) <T3>Time. </T3>The parties may agree to submit all prehearing motions andresponses and may agree to close discovery in the proceedings under thejoint schedule within a reasonable time before the date of the hearing,but not later than 15 days before the hearing. (d) <T3>Order establishing joint schedule. </T3>The administrative law judgeshall approve the joint schedule filed by the parties. One party shallsubmit a draft order establishing a joint schedule to the administrativelaw judge to be signed by the administrative law judge and filed with thehearing docket clerk. (e) <T3>Disputes. </T3>The administrative law judge shall resolve disputesregarding discovery or disputes regarding compliance with the joint scheduleas soon as possible so that the parties may continue to comply with thejoint schedule. (f) <T3>Sanctions for failure to comply with joint schedule. </T3>If a partyfails to comply with the administrative law judge's order establishinga joint schedule, the administrative law judge may direct that party tocomply with a motion or discovery request or, limited to the extent ofthe party's failure to comply with a motion or discovery request, the administrativelaw judge may_ (1) Strike that portion of a party's pleadings; (2) Preclude prehearing or discovery motions by that party; (3) Preclude admission of that portion of a party's evidence at the hearing;or (4) Preclude that portion of the testimony of that party's witnesses atthe hearing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.218</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Motions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>A party applying for an order or ruling not specificallyprovided in this subpart shall do so by motion. A party shall comply withthe requirements of this section when filing a motion with the administrativelaw judge. A party shall serve a copy of each motion on each party. (b) <T3>Form and contents. </T3>A party shall state the relief sought by themotion and the particular grounds supporting that relief. If a party hasevidence in support of a motion, the party shall attach any supportingevidence, including affidavits, to the motion. (c) <T3>Filing of motions. </T3>A motion made prior to the hearing must bein writing. Unless otherwise agreed by the parties or for good cause shown,a party shall file any prehearing motion, and shall serve a copy on eachparty, not later than 30 days before the hearing. Motions introduced duringa hearing may be made orally on the record unless the administrative lawjudge directs otherwise. (d) <T3>Answers to motions. </T3>Any party may file an answer, with affidavitsor other evidence in support of the answer, not later than 10 days afterservice of a written motion on that party. When a motion is made duringa hearing, the answer may be made at the hearing on the record, orallyor in writing, within a reasonable time determined by the administrativelaw judge. (e) <T3>Rulings on motions. </T3>The administrative law judge shall rule onall motions as follows: (1) <T3>Discovery motions. </T3>The administrative law judge shall resolveall pending discovery motions not later than 10 days before the hearing.(2) <T3>Prehearing motions. </T3>The administrative law judge shall resolveall pending prehearing motions not later than 7 days before the hearing.If the administrative law judge issues a ruling or order orally, the administrativelaw judge shall serve a written copy of the ruling or order, within 3 days,on each party. In all other cases, the administrative law judge shall issuerulings and orders in writing and shall serve a copy of the ruling or orderon each party.(3) <T3>Motions made during the hearing. </T3>The administrative law judgemay issue rulings and orders on motions made during the hearing orally.Oral rulings or orders on motions must be made on the record. (f) <T3>Specific motions. </T3>A party may file the following motions withthe administrative law judge: (1) <T3>Motion to dismiss for insufficiency. </T3>A party may file a motionto dismiss the order of civil penalty for insufficiency instead of an answer.If the administrative law judge denies the motion to dismiss the orderof civil penalty for insufficiency, the party who received the order ofcivil penalty shall file an answer not later than 10 days of service ofthe administrative law judge's denial of the motion. A motion to dismissthe order of civil penalty for insufficiency must show that the order ofcivil penalty fails to state a violation of the Federal Aviation Act of1958, as amended, or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder, ora violation of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or a rule, regulation,or order issued thereunder. (2) <T3>Motion to dismiss. </T3>A party may file a motion to dismiss an orderof civil penalty instead of an answer, specifying the grounds for dismissal.(i) If a motion to dismiss is not granted, the respondent shall file ananswer with the administrative law judge and shall serve a copy of theanswer on each party not later than 10 days after service of the administrativelaw judge's ruling or order on the motion to dismiss. (ii) If the administrative law judge grants a motion to dismiss and terminatesthe proceedings without a hearing, the agency attorney may file an appealpursuant to andSection; 13.233 of this subpart. If the administrative lawjudge grants a motion to dismiss in part, the agency attorney may appealthe administrative law judge's decision to dismiss part of the order ofcivil penalty under the provisions of andSection; 13.219(c) of this subpart.If required by the decision on appeal, the respondent shall file an answerwith the administrative law judge, and shall serve a copy of the answeron each party, not later than 10 days after service of the decision onappeal. (3) <T3>Motion for more definite statement. </T3>A party may file a motionfor more definite statement of any pleading which requires a response underthis subpart. A party shall set forth, in detail, the indefinite or uncertainallegations contained in an order of civil penalty or response to any pleadingand shall submit the details that the party believes would would make theallegation or response definite and certain. (i) <T3>Order of civil penalty. </T3>A party may file a motion requesting amore definite statement of the allegations contained in the order of civilpenalty instead of an answer. If the administrative law judge grants themotion, and the agency attorney does not supply a more definite statementnot later than 15 days after service of the order granting the motion,the administrative law judge shall strike the allegations in the orderof civil penalty to which the motion is directed. If the administrativelaw judge denies the motion, the respondent shall file an answer with theadministrative law judge and shall serve a copy of the answer on each partynot later than 10 days after service of the order of denial. (ii) <T3>Answer. </T3>A party may file a motion requesting a more definite statementif an answer fails to clearly respond to the allegations in the order ofcivil penalty. If the administrative law judge grants the motion, the respondentshall supply a more definite statement not later than 15 days after serviceof the ruling on the motion. If the respondent fails to supply a more definitestatement, the administrative law judge shall strike those statements inthe answer to which the motion is directed. A party's failure to supplya more definite statement is deemed a failure to answer and the unansweredallegations in the order of civil penalty are deemed admitted. (4) <T3>Motion to strike. </T3>Any party may make a motion to strike any insufficientallegation or defense, or any redundant, immaterial, or irrelevant matterin a pleading. A party shall file a motion to strike with the administrativelaw judge and shall serve a copy on each party before a response is requiredunder this subpart or, if a response is not required, not later than 10days after service of the pleading. (5) <T3>Motion for decision. </T3>A party may make a motion for decision, regardingall or any part of the proceedings, at any time before the administrativelaw judge has issued an initial decision in the proceedings. The administrativelaw judge shall grant a party's motion for decision if the pleadings, depositions,answers to interrogatories, admissions, matters that the administrativelaw judge has officially noticed, or evidence introduced during the hearingshow that there is no genuine issue of material fact and that the partymaking the motion is entitled to a decision as a matter of law. The partymaking the motion for decision has the burden of showing that there isno genuine issue of material fact disputed by the parties. (6) <T3>Motion for disqualification. </T3>A party may file a motion for disqualificationwith the administrative law judge and shall serve a copy on each party.A party may file the motion at any time after the administrative law judgehas been assigned to the proceedings but shall make the motion before theadministrative law judge files an initial decision in the proceedings.(i) <T3>Motion and supporting affidavit. </T3>A party shall state the groundsfor disqualification, including, but not limited to, personal bias, pecuniaryinterest, or other factors showing disqualification, in the motion fordisqualification. A party shall submit an affidavit with the motion fordisqualification that sets forth, in detail, the matters alleged to constitutegrounds for disqualification. (ii) <T3>Answer. </T3>A party shall respond to the motion for disqualificationnot later than 5 days after service of the motion for disqualification.(iii) <T3>Decision on motion for disqualification. </T3>The administrative lawjudge shall render a decision on the motion for disqualification not laterthan 15 days after the motion has been filed. If the administrative lawjudge finds that the motion for disqualification and supporting affidavitshow a basis for disqualification, the administrative law judge shall withdrawfrom the proceedings immediately. If the administrative law judge findsthat disqualification is not warranted, the administrative law judge shalldeny the motion and state the grounds for the denial on the record. Ifthe administrative law judge fails to rule on a party's motion for disqualificationwithin 15 days after the motion has been filed, the motion is deemed granted.(iv) <T3>Appeal. </T3>A party may appeal the administrative law judge's denialof the motion for disqualification in accordance with andSection; 13.219of this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.219</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Interlocutory appeals. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Unless otherwise provided in this subpart, a party maynot appeal a ruling or decision of the administrative law judge to theFAA decisionmaker until the initial decision has been entered on the record.A decision or order of the FAA decisionmaker on the interlocutory appealdoes not constitute a final order of the Administrator for the purposesof judicial appellate review under section 1006 of the Federal AviationAct of 1958, as amended. (b) <T3>Interlocutory appeal for cause. </T3>If a party files a written requestfor an interlocutory appeal for cause with the administrative law judge,or orally requests an interlocutory appeal for cause, the proceedings arestayed until the administrative law judge issues a decision on the request.If the administrative law judge grants the request, the proceedings arestayed until the FAA decisionmaker issues a decision on the interlocutoryappeal. The administrative law judge shall grant an interlocutory appealfor cause if a party shows that delay of the appeal would be detrimentalto the public interest or would result in undue prejudice to any party.(c) <T3>Interlocutory appeals of right. </T3>If a party notifies the administrativelaw judge of an interlocutory appeal of right, the proceedings are stayeduntil the FAA decisionmaker issues a decision on the interlocutory appeal.A party may file an interlocutory appeal with the FAA decisionmaker, withoutthe consent of the administrative law judge, before an initial decisionhas been entered in the case of_ (1) A ruling or order by the administrative law judge barring a personfrom the proceedings;(2) Failure of the administrative law judge to dismiss the proceedingsin accordance with andSection; 13.215 of this subpart; (3) A ruling or order by the administrative law judge in violation of andSection;13.205(b) of this subpart; and (4) A ruling by the administrative law judge granting, in part, a respondent'smotion to dismiss an order of civil penalty pursuant to andSection; 13.218(f)(2)(B).(d) <T3>Procedure. </T3>A party shall file a notice of interlocutory appeal,with supporting documents, with the FAA decisionmaker and the hearing docketclerk, and shall serve a copy of the notice and supporting documents oneach party and the administrative law judge, not later than 3 days afterthe administrative law judge's decision forming the basis of the appeal.A party shall file a reply brief, if any, with the FAA decisionmaker andserve a copy of the reply brief on each party, not later than 10 days afterservice of the appeal brief. If the FAA decisionmaker does not issue adecision on the interlocutory appeal or does not seek additional informationwithin 10 days of the filing of the appeal, the stay of the proceedingis dissolved. The FAA decisionmaker shall render a decision on the interlocutoryappeal, on the record and as a part of the decision in the proceedings,within a reasonable time after receipt of the interlocutory appeal. (e) The FAA decisionmaker may reject frivolous, repetitive, or dilatoryappeals, and may issue an order precluding one or more parties from makingfurther interlocutory appeals in a proceeding in which there have beenfrivolous, repetitive, or dilatory interlocutory appeals. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.220</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discovery. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Initiation of discovery. </T3>Any party may initiate discovery describedin this section, without the consent or approval of the administrativelaw judge, at any time after a complaint has been filed in the proceedings.(b) <T3>Methods of discovery. </T3>The following methods of discovery are permittedunder this section: Depositions on oral examination or written questionsof any person; written interrogatories directed to a party; requests forproduction of documents or tangible items to any person; and requests foradmission by a party. A party is not required to file written interrogatoriesand responses, requests for production of documents or tangible items andresponses, and requests for admission and responses with the administrativelaw judge or the hearing docket clerk. In the event of a discovery dispute,a party shall attach a copy of these documents in support of a motion madeunder this section. (c) <T3>Service on the agency. </T3>A party shall serve each discovery requestdirected to the agency or an agency employee on the agency attorney ofrecord. (d) <T3>Time for responses to discovery requests. </T3>Unless otherwise directedby this subpart or agreed by the parties, a party shall respond to a requestfor discovery, including filing objections to a request for discovery,not later than 30 days of service of the request. (e) <T3>Scope of discovery. </T3>Subject to the limits on discovery set forthparagraph (f) of this section, a party may discover any matter that isnot privileged and that is relevant to the subject matter of the proceeding.A party may discover information that relates to the claim or defense ofany party including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition,and location of any document or other tangible item and the identity andlocation of any person having knowledge of discoverable matter. A partymay discover facts known, or opinions held, by an expert who any otherparty expects to call to testify at the hearing. A party has no groundto object to a discovery request on the basis that the information soughtwould not be admissible at the hearing if the information sought duringdiscovery is reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissibleevidence. (f) <T3>Limiting discovery. </T3>The administrative law judge shall limit thefrequency and extent of discovery permitted by this section if a partyshows that_ (1) The information requested is cumulative or repetitious; (2) The information requested can be obtained from another less burdensomeand more convenient source; (3) The party requesting the information has had ample opportunity to obtainthe information through other discovery methods permitted under this section;(4) The method or scope of discovery requested by the party is unduly burdensomeor expensive. (g) <T3>Confidential orders. </T3>A party or person who has received a discoveryrequest for information that is related to a trade secret, confidentialor sensitive material, competitive or commercial information, proprietarydata, or information on research and development, may file a motion fora confidential order with the administrative law judge and shall servea copy of the motion for a confidential order on each party. (1) The party or person making the motion must show that the confidentialorder is necessary to protect the information from disclosure to the public.(2) If the administrative law judge determines that the requested materialis not necessary to decide the case, the administrative law judge shallpreclude any inquiry into the matter by any party. (3) If the administrative law judge determines that the requested materialmay be disclosed during discovery, the administrative law judge may orderthat the material may be discovered and disclosed under limited conditionsor may be used only under certain terms and conditions. (4) If the administrative law judge determines that the requested materialis necessary to decide the case and that a confidential order is warranted,the administrative law judge shall provide_ (i) An opportunity for review of the document by the parties off the record;(ii) Procedures for excluding the information from the record; and (iii) Order that the parties shall not disclose the information in anymanner and the parties shall not use the information in any other proceeding.(h) <T3>Protective orders. </T3>A party or a person who has received a requestfor discovery may file a motion for protective order with the administrativelaw judge and shall serve a copy of the motion for protective order oneach party. The party or person making the motion must show that the protectiveorder is necessary to protect the party or the person from annoyance, embarrassment,oppression, or undue burden or expense. As part of the protective order,the administrative law judge may_ (1) Deny the discovery request; (2) Order that discovery be conducted only on specified terms and conditions,including a designation of the time or place for discovery or a determinationof the method of discovery; or (3) Limit the scope of discovery or preclude any inquiry into certain mattersduring discovery.(i) <T3>Duty to supplement or amend responses. </T3>A party who has respondedto a discovery request has a duty to supplement or amend the response,as soon as the information is known, as follows: (1) A party shall supplement or amend any response to a question requestingthe identity and location of any person having knowledge of discoverablematters. (2) A party shall supplement or amend any response to a question requestingthe identity of each person who will be called to testify at the hearingas an expert witness' the subject matter and substance of that witness,testimony. (3) A party shall supplement or amend any response that was incorrect whenmade or any response that was correct when made but is no longer correct,accurate, or complete. (j) <T3>Depositions. </T3>The following rules apply to depositions taken pursuantto this section: (1) <T3>Form. </T3>A deposition shall be taken on the record and reduced towriting. The person being deposed shall sign the deposition unless theparties agree to waive the requirement of a signature. (2) <T3>Administration of oaths. </T3>Within the United States, or a territoryor possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, a partyshall take a deposition before a person authorized to administer oathsby the laws of the United States or authorized by the law of the placewhere the examination is held. In foreign countries, a party shall takea deposition in any manner allowed by the <T3>Federal Rules of Civil Procedure. </T3>(3) <T3>Notice of deposition. </T3>A party shall serve a notice of deposition,stating the time and place of the deposition and the name and address ofeach person to be examined, on the person to be deposed, on the administrativelaw judge, on the hearing docket clerk, and on each party not later than7 days before the deposition. A party may serve a notice of depositionless than 7 days before the deposition only with consent of the administrativelaw judge. If a subpoena <T3>duces tecum </T3>is to be served on the person to be examined, theparty shall attach a copy of the subpoena <T3>duces tecum, </T3>that describes the materials to be produced at thedeposition, to the notice of deposition. (4) <T3>Use of depositions. </T3>A party may use any part or all of a depositionat a hearing authorized under this subpart only upon a showing of goodcause. The deposition may be used against any party who was present orrepresented at the deposition or who had reasonable notice of the deposition.(k) <T3>Interrogatories. </T3>A party shall not serve more than 30 interrogatoriesto each other party. Each subpart of an interrogatory shall be countedas a separate interrogatory. (1) A party shall answer each interrogatory separately and completely inwriting and under oath. A party's attorney may sign the response to theinterrogatories if the attorney has verification of authority to sign fromthe party. If a party objects to an interrogatory, the party shall statethe objection and the reasons for the objection. (2) A party shall file a motion for leave to serve additional interrogatorieson a party with the administrative law judge before serving additionalinterrogatories on a party. The administrative law judge shall grant themotion only if the party shows good cause for the party's failure to inquireabout the information previously and that the information can not reasonablybe obtained using less burdensome discovery methods or be obtained fromother sources. (l) <T3>Requests for admission. </T3>A party may serve a written request foradmission of the truth of any matter within the scope of discovery underthis section or the authenticity of any document described in the request.A party shall set forth each request for admission separately. A partyshall serve copies of documents referenced in the request for admissionunless the documents have been provided or are reasonably available forinspection and copying. (1) <T3>Time. </T3>A party's failure to respond to a request for admission,in writing and signed by the attorney or the party, not later than 30 daysafter service of the request, is deemed an admission of the truth of thestatement or statements contained in the request for admission. The administrativelaw judge may determine that a failure to respond to a request for admissionis not deemed an admission of the truth if a party shows that the failurewas due to circumstances beyond the control of the party or the party'sattorney. (2) <T3>Response. </T3>A party may object to a request for admission and shallstate the reasons for objection. A party may specifically deny the truthof the matter or describe the reasons why the party is unable to truthfullydeny or admit the matter. If a party is unable to deny or admit the truthof the matter, the party shall show that the party has made reasonableinquiry into the matter or that the information known to, or readily-obtainableby, the party is insufficient to enable the party to admit or deny thematter. A party may admit or deny any part of the request for admission.If the administrative law judge determines that a response does not complywith the requirements of this rule or that the response is insufficient,the matter is deemed admitted.(3) <T3>Effect of admission</T3>. Any matter admitted or deemed admitted underthis section is conclusively established for the purpose of the hearingand appeal. Any matter admitted or deemed admitted under this section thatresults in a finding of violation may be used by the Administrator in asubsequent enforcement proceeding.(m) <T3>Motion to compel discovery</T3>. A party may make a motion to compeldiscovery if a person refuses to answer a question during a deposition,a party fails or refuses to answer an interrogatory, if a person givesan evasive or incomplete answer during a deposition or when respondingto an interrogatory, or a party fails or refuses to produce documents ortangible items. During a deposition, the proponent of a question may completethe deposition or may adjourn the examination before making a motion tocompel if a person refuses to answer.(n) <T3>Failure to comply with a discovery order or order to compel. </T3>Ifa party fails to comply with a discovery order or an order to compel, theadministrative law judge, limited to the extent of the party's failureto comply with the discovery order or motion to compel, may_(1) Strike that portion of a party's pleadings;(2) Preclude prehearing or discovery motions by that party;(3) Preclude admission of that portion of a party's evidence at the hearing;or(4) Preclude that portion of the testimony of that party's witnesses atthe hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.221</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of hearing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice</T3>. The administrative law judge shall give each party atleast 60 days notice of the date and time of the hearing.(b) <T3>Date and time of the hearing</T3>. The administrative law judge towhom the proceedings have been assigned shall set a reasonable date andtime for the hearing. The administrative law judge shall consider the needfor discovery and any joint procedural or discovery schedule submittedby the parties when determining the hearing date.(c) <T3>Location of the hearing</T3>. After assignment of an administrativelaw judge to the proceedings, a party may file a motion to change the locationof the hearing or the administrative law judge on his own motion may changethe location of the hearing. The administrative law judge shall give dueregard to where the majority of the witnesses reside or work, the convenienceof the parties, and whether the location is served by scheduled air carrier.(d) <T3>Earlier hearing</T3>. With the consent of the administrative law judge,the parties may agree to hold the hearing on an earlier date than the datespecified in the notice of hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.222</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evidence.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General</T3>. A party is entitled to present the party's case or defenseby oral, documentary, or demonstrative evidence, to submit rebuttal evidence,and to conduct any cross-examination that may be required for a full andtrue disclosure of the facts.(b) <T3>Admissibility</T3>. A party may introduce any oral, documentary, ordemonstrative evidence in support of the party's case or defense. The administrativelaw judge shall admit any oral, documentary, or demonstrative evidenceintroduced by a party but shall exclude irrelevant, immaterial, or undulyrepetitious evidence.(c) <T3>Hearsay evidence</T3>. Hearsay evidence is admissible in proceedingsgoverned by this subpart. The fact that evidence submitted by a party ishearsay goes only to the weight of the evidence and does not affect itsadmissibility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.223</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standard of proof.</ITAG>The administrative law judge shall issue an initial decision or shall rulein a party's favor only if the decision or ruling is supported by, andin accordance with, the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence containedin the record. In order to prevail, the party with the burden of proofshall prove the party's case or defense by a preponderance of reliable,probative, and substantial evidence.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.224</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Burden of proof.</ITAG>(a) Except in the case of an affirmative defense, the burden of proof ison the agency.(b) Except as otherwise provided by statute or rule, the proponent of amotion, request, or order has the burden of proof.(c) A party who has asserted an affirmative defense has the burden of provingthe affirmative defense. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.225 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Offer of proof.</ITAG>A party whose evidence has been excluded by a ruling of the administrativelaw judge may offer the evidence for the record on appeal.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.226 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public disclosure of evidence.</ITAG>(a) The administrative law judge may order that any information containedin the record be withheld from public disclosure. Any person may objectto disclosure of information in the record by filing a written motion towithhold specific information with the administrative law judge and servinga copy of the motion on each party. The party shall state the specificgrounds for nondisclosure in the motion.(b) The administrative law judge shall grant the motion to withhold informationin the record if, based on the motion and any response to the motion, theadministrative law judge determines that disclosure would be detrimentalto aviation safety, disclosure would not be in the public interest, orthat the information is not otherwise required to be made available tothe public.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.227 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testimony by agency employees.</ITAG>An employee of the agency may not testify as an expert or opinion witness,for any party other than the agency, in any proceeding governed by thissubpart. An employee of the agency may testify in a proceeding governedby this subpart only as to facts, within the employee's personal knowledge,giving rise to the incident or violation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.228 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoenas.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Request for subpoena.</T3> A party may obtain a subpoena to compelthe attendance of a witness at a deposition or hearing or to require theproduction of documents or tangible items from the hearing docket clerk.The hearing docket clerk shall deliver the subpoena, signed by the hearingdocket clerk or an administrative law judge but otherwise in blank, tothe party. The party shall complete the subpoena, stating the title ofthe action and the date and time for the witness' attendance or productionof documents or items. The party who obtained the subpoena shall servethe subpoena on the witness.(b) <T3>Motion to quash or modify the subpoena.</T3> Any person upon whom asubpoena has been served may file a motion to quash or modify the subpoenawith the administrative law judge at or before the time specified in thesubpoena for compliance. The applicant shall describe, in detail, the basisfor the application to quash or modify the subpoena including, but notlimited to, a statement that the testimony or the documents or tangibleevidence is not relevant to the proceeding, that that subpoena is not reasonablytailored to the scope of the proceeding, or that the subpoena is unreasonableand oppressive. A motion to quash or modify the subpoena will stay theeffect of the subpoena pending a decision by the administrative law judgeon the motion.(c) <T3>Enforcement of subpoena.</T3> Upon a showing that a person has failedor refused to comply with a subpoena, a party may apply to the local Federaldistrict court to seek judicial enforcement of the subpoena in accordancewith section 1004 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.229 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Witness fees.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Unless otherwise authorized by the administrative lawjudge, the party who applies for a subpoena to compel the attendance ofa witness at a deposition or hearing, or the party at whose request a witnessappears at a deposition or hearing, shall pay the witness fees describedin this section.(b) <T3>Amount.</T3> Except for an FAA employee who appears at the directionof the agency, a witness who appears at a disposition or hearing is entitledto the same fees and mileage expenses as are paid to a witness in a courtof the United States in comparable circumstances.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.230 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Record.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Exclusive record.</T3> The transcript of all testimony in the hearing,all exhibits received into evidence, and all motions, applications, requests,and rulings shall constitute the exclusive record for decision of the proceedingsand the basis for the issuance of any orders in the proceeding. Any proceedingsregarding the disqualification of an administrative law judge shall beincluded in the record.(b) <T3>Examination and copying of record.</T3> Any person may examine therecord at the Hearing Docket, Federal Aviation Administration, 800 IndependenceAvenue SW., Room 914E, Washington, DC 20591. Any person may have a copyof the record after payment of reasonable costs to copy the record.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.231 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Argument before the administrative law judge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Arguments during the hearing.</T3> During the hearing, the administrativelaw judge shall give the parties a reasonable opportunity to present oralarguments on the record supporting or opposing motions, objections, andrulings if the parties request an opportunity for argument. Only in a clearlycomplex or unusual case, the administrative law judge may request or theparties may agree to file written arguments with the administrative lawjudge.(b) <T3>Final oral argument.</T3> At the conclusion of the hearing and beforethe administrative law judge issues an initial decision in the proceedings,the parties are entitled to submit oral proposed findings of fact and conclusionsof law, exceptions to rulings of the administrative law judge, and supportingarguments for the findings, conclusions, or exceptions. At the conclusionof the hearing, a party may waive final oral argument.(c) <T3>Posthearing briefs.</T3> Only in a clearly complex or unusual case,the administrative law judge may request or the parties may agree to filewritten posthearing briefs, instead of final oral argument, before theadministrative law judge issues an initial decision in the proceedings.If a party files a written posthearing brief, the party shall include proposedfindings of fact and conclusions of law, exceptions to rulings of the administrativelaw judge, and supporting arguments for the findings, conclusions, or exceptions.The administrative law judge shall give the parties a reasonable opportunity,not more than 30 days after receipt of the transcript, to prepare and submitthe briefs.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.232</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Contents. </T3>The administrative law judge shall issue an initialdecision at the conclusion of the hearing and may affirm, modify, or reversethe order of civil penalty. In each oral or written decision, the administrativelaw judge shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, and thegrounds supporting those findings and conclusions, upon all material issuesof fact, the credibility of witnesses, the applicable law, any exerciseof the administrative law judge's discretion, the reasonableness of anysanction contained in the order of civil penalty, and a discussion of thebasis for any order issued in the proceedings. The administrative law judgeis not required to provide a written explanation for rulings on objections,procedural motions, and other matters not directly relevant to the substanceof the initial decision. If the administrative law judge reduces the civilpenalty contained in the order of civil penalty, the administrative lawjudge shall provide a basis supporting the reduction in civil penalty.If the administrative law judge refers to any previous unreported or unpublishedinitial decision, the administrative law judge shall make copies of thatinitial decision available to the parties and the FAA decisionmaker.(b) <T3>Oral decision. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this section,at the conclusion of the hearing, the administrative law judge shall issuethe initial decision and order orally on the record.(c) <T3>Written decision. </T3>Only in a clearly complex or unusual case, theadministrative law judge may issue a written initial decision not laterthan 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing or submission of the lastposthearing brief. The administrative law judge shall serve a copy of thewritten initial decision on each party.(d) <T3>Order assessing civil penalty.</T3> If the administrative law judgeaffirms or modifies the order of civil penalty, the order shall becomean order assessing civil penalty.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.233</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals from initial decisions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice of appeal.</T3> A party may appeal the initial decision, andany decision not previously appealed pursuant to andSection; 13.219, by filinga notice of appeal with the FAA decisionmaker. A party shall file the noticeof appeal with the Federal Aviation Administration, 800 Independence AvenueSW., Room 914E, Washington, DC 20591, Attn: Appellate Docket Clerk. A partyshall file the notice of appeal not later than 10 days after entry of theoral initial decision on the record or service of the written initial decisionon the parties and shall serve a copy of the notice of appeal on each party.(b) <T3>Issues on appeal. </T3>A party may appeal only the following issues:(1) Whether each filing of fact is supported by a preponderance of reliable,probative, and substantial evidence;(2) Whether each conclusion of law is made in accordance with applicablelaw, precedent, and public policy; and(3) Whether the administrative law judge committed any prejudicial errorsduring the hearing that support the appeal.(c) <T3>Perfecting an appeal. </T3>Unless otherwise agreed by the parties,a party shall perfect an appeal, not later than 50 days after entry ofthe oral initial decision on the record or service of the written initialdecision on the party, by filing an appeal brief with the FAA decisionmaker.(1) <T3>Extension of time by agreement of the parties. </T3>The parties mayagree to extend the time for perfecting the appeal with the consent ofthe FAA decisionmaker. If the FAA decisionmaker grants an extension oftime to perfect the appeal, the appellate docket clerk shall serve a letterconfirming the extension of time on each party.(2) <T3>Written motion for extension. </T3>If the parties do not agree to anextension of time for perfecting an appeal, a party desiring an extensionof time may file a written motion for an extension with the FAA decisionmakerand shall serve a copy of the motion on each party. The FAA decisionmakermay grant an extension if good cause for the extension is shown in themotion.(d) <T3>Appeal briefs. </T3>A party shall file the appeal brief with the FAAdecisionmaker and shall serve a copy of the appeal brief on each party.(1) A party shall set forth, in detail, the party's specific objectionsto the initial decision or rulings in the appeal brief. A party also shallset forth, in detail, the basis for the appeal, the reasons supportingthe appeal, and the relief requested in the appeal. If the party relieson evidence contained in the record for the appeal, the party shall specificallyrefer to the pertinent evidence contained in the transcript in the appealbrief.(2) The FAA decisionmaker may dismiss an appeal, on the FAA decisionmaker'sown initiative or upon motion of any other party, where a party has fileda notice of appeal but fails to perfect the appeal by timely filing ofan appeal brief with the FAA decisionmaker.(e) <T3>Reply brief. </T3>Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, any partymay file a reply brief with the FAA decisionmaker not later than 35 daysafter the appeal brief has been served on that party. The party filingthe reply brief shall serve a copy of the reply brief on each party. Ifthe party relies on evidence contained in the record for the reply, theparty shall specifically refer to the pertinent evidence contained in thetranscript in the reply brief. (1) <T3>Extension of time by agreement of the parties. </T3>The parties mayagree to extend the time for filing a reply brief with the consent of theFAA decisionmaker. If the FAA decisionmaker grants an extension of timeto file the reply brief, the appellate docket clerk shall serve a letterconfirming the extension of time on each party. (2) <T3>Written motion for extension. </T3>If the parties do not agree to anextension of time for filing a reply brief, a party desiring an extensionof time may file a written motion for an extension with the FAA decisionmakerand shall serve a copy of the motion on each party. The FAA decisionmakermay grant an extension if good cause for the extension is shown in themotion. (f) <T3>Other briefs. </T3>The FAA decisionmaker may allow any person to submitan <T3>amicus curiae </T3>brief in an appeal of an initial decision. A partymay not file more than one appeal brief or reply brief. A party may petitionthe FAA decisionmaker, in writing, for leave to file an additional briefand shall serve a copy of the petition on each party. The party may notfile the additional brief with the petition. The FAA decisionmaker maygrant leave to file an additional brief if the party demonstrates goodcause for allowing additional argument on the appeal. The FAA decisionmakerwill allow a reasonable time for the party to file the additional brief.(g) <T3>Number of copies. </T3>A party shall file the original appeal briefor the original reply brief, and 2 copies of the brief, with the FAA decisionmaker.(h) <T3>Oral argument. </T3>The FAA decisionmaker has sole discretion to permitoral argument on the appeal. On the FAA decisionmaker's own initiativeor upon written motion by any party, the FAA decisionmaker may find thatoral argument will contribute substantially to the development of the issueson appeal and may grant the parties an opportunity for oral argument. (i) <T3>Waiver of objections on appeal. </T3>If a party fails to object toany alleged error regarding the proceedings in an appeal or a reply brief,the party waives any objection to the alleged error. The FAA decisionmakeris not required to consider any objection in an appeal brief or any argumentin the reply brief if a party's objection is based on evidence containedon the record and the party does not specifically refer to the pertinentevidence from the record in the brief. (j) <T3>FAA decisionmaker's decision on appeal. </T3>The FAA decisionmakerwill review the briefs on appeal and the oral argument, if any, to determineif the administrative law judge committed prejudicial error in the proceedingsor that the order should be affirmed, modified, or reversed. The FAA decisionmakermay affirm, modify, or reverse the initial decision, make any necessaryfindings, or may remand the case for any proceedings that the FAA decisionmakerdetermines may be necessary. (1) The FAA decisionmaker may raise any issue, on the FAA decisionmaker'sown initiative, that is required for proper disposition of the proceedings.The FAA decisionmaker will give the parties a reasonable opportunity tosubmit arguments on the new issues before making a decision on appeal.(2) The FAA decisionmaker will issue the final decision and order of theAdministrator on appeal in writing and will serve a copy of the decisionand order on each party. (3) A final decision and order of the Administrator after appeal is precedentin any other civil penalty action. Any issue, finding or conclusion, order,ruling, or initial decision of an administrative law judge that has notbeen appealed to the FAA decisionmaker is not precedent in any other civilpenalty action. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.234 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Petitions to reconsider or modify a final decision and order of theFAA decisionmaker on appeal.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Any party may petition the FAA decisionmaker to reconsideror modify a final decision and order issued by the FAA decisionmaker onappeal from an initial decision. A party shall file a petition to reconsideror modify with the FAA decisionmaker not later than 30 days after serviceof the FAA decisionmaker's final decision and order on appeal and shallserve a copy of the petition on each party. The FAA decisionmaker willnot reconsider or modify an initial decision and order issued by an administrativelaw judge that has not been appealed by any party to the FAA descisionmaker.(b) <T3>Form and number of copies.</T3> A party shall file a petition to reconsideror modify in writing with the FAA decisionmaker. The party shall file theoriginal petition with the FAA decisionmaker and shall serve a copy ofthe petition on each party.(c) <T3>Contents.</T3> A party shall state briefly and specifically the allegederrors in the final decision and order on appeal, the relief sought bythe party, and the grounds that support the petition to reconsider or modify.(1) If the petition is based, in whole or in part, on allegations regardingthe consequences of the FAA decisionmaker's decision, the party shall describethese allegations and shall describe, and support, the basis for the allegations.(2) If the petition is based, in whole or in part, on new material notpreviously raised in the proceedings, the party shall set forth the newmaterial and include affidavits of prospective witnesses and authenticateddocuments that would be introduced in support of the new material. Theparty shall explain, in detail, why the new material was not discoveredthrough due diligence prior to the hearing.(d) <T3>Repetitious and frivolous petitions.</T3> The FAA decisionmaker willnot consider repetitious or frivolous petitions. The FAA decisionmakermay summarily dismiss repetitious or frivolous petitions to reconsideror modify.(e) <T3>Reply petitions.</T3> Any other party may reply to a petition to reconsideror modify, not later than 10 days after service of the petition on thatparty, by filing a reply with the FAA decisionmaker. A party shall servea copy of the reply on each party.(f) <T3>Effect of filing petition.</T3> Unless otherwise ordered by the FAAdecisionmaker, filing of a petition pursuant to this section will not stayor delay the effective date of the FAA decisionmaker's final decision andorder on appeal and shall not toll the time allowed for judicial review.(g) <T3>FAA decisionmaker's decision on petition.</T3> The FAA decisionmakerhas sole discretion to grant or deny a petition to reconsider or modify.The FAA decisionmaker will grant or deny a petition to reconsider or modifywithin a reasonable time after receipt of the petition or receipt of thereply petition, if any. The FAA decisionmaker may affirm, modify, or reversethe final decision and order on appeal, or may remand the case for anyproceedings that the FAA decisionmaker determines may be necessary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 13.235 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Judicial review of final decision and order.</ITAG>A person may seek judicial review of a final decision and order of theAdministrator as provided in andSection; 1006 of the Federal Aviation Actof 1958, as amended. A party seeking judicial review of a final decisionand order shall file a petition for review not later than 60 days afterthe final decision and order has been served on the party.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on August 31, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">T. Allan McArtor,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-20184 Filed 9-1-88; 12:25 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>